Donald Trump|Speech: Donald Trump in Raleigh, NC|July 5, 2016
[This was transcribed and punctuated by Factba.se's AI, Margaret, and automatically corrected based on her understanding of Donald Trump's speech patterns. It has not been edited by a human. Please double-check any quotes against the video.]
Wow, look at that, Wow, look at that, Wow, look at that. I love you. I love you. North Carolina, I - I love you, I love you. North Carolina, I - I love you, I love you. North Carolina, I love you, unbelievable love you. Unbelievable love you. Unbelievable. You know it's an incredible thing. The - you know it's an incredible thing.
The - you know it's an incredible thing. The system is rigged system is rigged, system is rigged, but we're still happy to be together. But we're still happy to be together, but we're still happy to be together, right, right, right? It's totally rigged. What a system a lot, it's totally rigged, what a system, a lot, it's totally rigged, what a system, a lot of group, I'll tell you what, what's going of group.
I'll tell you what, what's going of group. I'll tell you what, what's going on and we're gonna be talking about it on and we're gonna be talking about it on and we're gonna be talking about it. But before I do a great friend of mine, but before I do a great friend of mine, but before I do a great friend of mine, somebody respected by everybody, senator somebody respected by everybody, senator somebody respected by everybody, senator bob Corker come on up, Bob, come On up, I wasn't gonna say anything, I just came to wasn't gonna say anything, I just came to wasn't gonna say anything I just came to visit but I have to say something the visit, but I have to say something the visit.
But I have to say something, the rallies that I have back home pretty rallies that I have back home pretty rallies that I have back home pretty cool. Yeah, this is unbelievable in it had cool. Yeah, this is unbelievable in it had cool. Yeah, this is unbelievable. In it had a pretty remarkable day today, pretty a pretty remarkable day today, pretty a pretty remarkable day today, pretty remarkable day.
You know, it says a lot remarkable day. You know, it says a lot remarkable day. You know, it says a lot about it, about it, about it says a lot about a person to meet their says a lot about a person to meet their says a lot about a person to meet their family. It's been time with their their family. It's been time with their - their family.
It's been time with their - their kids, if you will, Ivanka and Eric and kids, if you will, Ivanka and Eric and kids, if you will, Ivanka and Eric and their son-in-law and to be around the - their son-in-law and to be around the - their son-in-law and to be Around the people that have worked in the Trump, people that have worked in the Trump, people that have worked in the Trump Organization for 25 and 30 years to see Organization for 25 and 30 years to see Organization for 25 and 30 years to see the respect.
That they have for the - the respect that they have for the - the respect that they have for the person. They've worked with the father person. They've worked with the father person. They've worked with the father and father-in-law that they have to see and father-in-law that they have to see and father-in-law that they have to see how he treats the people that around him, how he treats the people that around him, how he treats the people that around Him so many times in these cam so many times in these cam so many times in these cam people become caricatures of what the people become caricatures of what the people become caricatures of what the media makes them and all too often after media makes them.
And all too often after media makes them and all too often after a race is over, people realize they never a race is over. People realize they never a race is over. People realize they never really knew the person. Somebody once really knew the person, somebody once really knew the person, somebody once told me it's not who you know in life told me, it's not who you know in life told me, it's not who you know in life.
It's how you know him. And I have the - it's how you know him and I have the - it's how you know him. And I have the incredible privilege today to spend time incredible privilege today to spend time incredible privilege today to spend time with this man with this man with this man to spend time with his family and to, to spend time with his family and to to spend Time with his family and to spend time with those who know him, so spend time with those who know him.
So spend time with those who know him so well. And I figured out the reason that well and I figured out the reason that well and I figured out the reason that you love him so much is because you love him so much is because you love him so much is because I'm taking up his time. Let me just say I'm taking up his time.
Let me just say I'm taking up his time. Let me just say this. The reason you love him so much is this, the reason you love him so much is this. The reason you love him so much is because he loves you, he loves you and he - because he loves you, he loves you and he - because he loves you, he loves you and he wants the best for you.
The pro, the wants the best for you. The pro the wants the best for you, the pro, the Republican nominee for president, Donald Republican nominee for president, Donald Republican nominee for president; Donald Trump, Trump Trump great guy, great guy, great person. So I great guy, great guy, great person.
So I great guy, great guy. Great person, so I have to tell you a few things, numbers have to tell you a few things. Numbers have to tell you a few things. Numbers just came out just now. Number one, we're just came out just now. Number one, we're just came out just now number one, we're doing very well in the polls that's doing very well in the polls that's doing very well in the polls.
That's important. Okay, very, very, very well. But important, okay, very, very, very well. But important, okay, very, very, very well. But you know, the numbers just came out that, you know, the numbers just came out that you know the numbers just came out that during the primary system during the - during the primary system during the - during the primary system during the primaries, the Republicans.
I wonder why primaries, the Republicans, I wonder why primaries, the Republicans, I wonder why were up sixty-two percent, the Democrats were up sixty-two percent, the Democrats were up sixty-two percent, the Democrats were down 21 %. These the final numbers were down 21 %. These - the final numbers were down 21 %, these - the final numbers just came out that tells you a little just came out that tells you a little just came out.
That tells you a little bit a little bit about what's going on bit a little bit about what's going on bit a little bit about what's going on and what's going on very big and big and what's going on very big and big and what's going on. Very big and big league is what you witness today and league is what you witness today.
And league is what you witness today and over the last week from Bill Clinton over the last week from Bill Clinton over the last week from Bill Clinton going to the plane just happened to be going to - the plane, just happened to be going to the plane. Just happened to be there just happened to be there.
I wonder there just happened to be there. I wonder there just happened to be there. I wonder how long he waited, but for Bill Clinton, how long he waited, but for Bill Clinton, how long he waited. But for Bill Clinton, to go to the plane and then to have what to go to the plane and then to have what to go to the plane and then to have what happened today, where essentially I happened today where essentially I happened today where essentially I Thought everybody thought based on what thought everybody thought based on what thought everybody thought based on what was being said, she was guilty.
She was - was being said, she was guilty. She was - was being said, she was guilty, she was guilty and it turned out that we're not guilty. And it turned out that we're not guilty. And it turned out that we're not going to press charges is - it's really going to press charges is - it's really going to press charges is it's really amazing.
But I'll tell you, I'll tell you amazing, but I'll tell you, I'll tell you amazing, but I'll tell you, I'll tell you, look, we have a - we have a rigged system. Look, we have a - we have a rigged system. Look, we have a - we have a rigged system, folks, hey, I used to say it during the folks, hey, I used to say it during the folks, hey, I used to say it during the primers we're all together.
I won North primers, we're all together. I won North primers, we're all together. I won North Carolina big league because of you big Carolina big league because of you big Carolina big league because of you big Lee and not only did the Republican Party go and not only did the Republican Party go and not only did the Republican Party go Way up from what it was four years ago, way up from what it was four years ago, way up from what it was four years ago, way way up.
But Donald Trump in the way way up, but Donald Trump in the way way up. But Donald Trump in the history of the primary system, Republican history of the primary system, Republican history of the primary system, Republican Party with 17 people running a lot of Party with 17 people running a lot of Party with 17 people running.
A lot of people don't understand where you say 17 people don't understand where you say 17 people don't understand where you say 17 people. I got almost 14 million votes people. I got almost 14 million votes people. I got almost 14 million votes more than anybody in the history of the - more than anybody in the history of the - more than anybody in the history of the Republican Party more than Ronald Reagan, more than the bushes, more than Richard, more than the bushes more than Richard, more than the bushes more than Richard Nixon, more than Dwight D Eisenhower who Nixon more than Dwight D, Eisenhower who Nixon more than Dwight D Eisenhower who did win the second world war.
It did win the second world war. It did win the second world war. It certainly helped a heck of a lot, certainly helped a heck of a lot, certainly helped a heck of a lot. We got the highest vote count in the - we got the highest vote count in the - we got the highest vote count in the history of the Republican Party that was history of the Republican Party that was history of the Republican Party that was such a big thing For me, such a big thing for me, such a big thing for me, we won 37 states.
We were - I mean, it just - we won 37 states. We were - I mean, it just - we won 37 states. We were - I mean, it just got stronger and stronger and stronger got stronger and stronger and stronger got stronger and stronger and stronger. And I think we're stronger now than ever. And I think we're stronger now than ever.
And I think we're stronger now than ever before before before we're fighting a very dishonest media. We - we're fighting a very dishonest media. We - we're fighting a very dishonest media. We have a protester. I get him out. Please have a protester. I get him out. Please have a protester. I get him out, please.
Oh, we love our protesters don't we? It's - oh, we love our protesters don't we? It's - oh, we love our protesters don't we. It's the only time I get the cameras to turn the only time I get the cameras to turn the only time I get the cameras to turn. The only time we get those cameras to the only time we get those cameras to the only time we get those cameras to turn Lee the size of this place.
This is turn Lee the size of this place. This is turn Lee the size of this place. This is really great, this is really great, get really great. This is really great, get really great. This is really great, get them out, get them out, get them out, all them out, get them out, get them out, all them out, get them out, get them out.
All right. Thank you. Right. Thank you, right. Thank you. Thank you. That's all right. Take it easy. Take it that's all right. Take it easy, take it, that's all right. Take it easy, take it easy folks, you know, if I could speak to easy folks, you know, if I could speak to easy folks, you know if I could speak to these people for a little while.
What do these people for a little while? What do these people for a little while? What do we want when you think of it? We want - we want - when you think of it, we want - we want - when you think of it, we want good education. We want a strong military, good education. We want a strong military, good education.
We want a strong military, we want strong borders. We do want the - we want strong borders, we do want the - we want strong borders, we do want the wall, we want to keep our jobs in North wall. We want to keep our jobs in North wall. We want to keep our jobs in North Carolina. We want to keep our jobs in North.
We want to keep our jobs in North. We want to keep our jobs in North Carolina. I mean look at what's going on Carolina, I mean look at what's going on Carolina, I mean look at what's going on folks, we're gonna build the wall, don't folks, we're gonna build the wall, don't folks we're gonna build the wall, don't worry who's Gon na pay for the wall, who's worry, who's gonna pay for the wall?
Who's worry, who's gonna pay for the wall, who's gonna pay? I didn't hear you who's gonna gonna pay, I didn't hear you who's gonna gonna pay. I didn't hear you who's gonna pay better, believe it, they're gonna pay pay better, believe it, they're gonna pay pay better, believe it, they're gonna pay, they'll be happy to pay if the right, they'll be happy to pay, if the right, they'll be Happy to pay if the right person asks some, they're gonna be happy person asks some, they're gonna be happy person asks some, they're gonna be happy to pay, no problem if the wrong person to pay no problem if the wrong person to pay.
No problem if the wrong person like crooked, Hillary Clinton asks, um like crooked, Hillary Clinton asks, um like crooked, Hillary Clinton asks, um, they're not gonna pay. They're not gonna pay. They're not gonna pay, but she's never going to ask. She's never. But she's never going to ask, she's never, but she's never going to ask.
She's never gonna ask. And I'll tell you what, when it gonna ask and I'll tell you what, when it gonna ask and I'll tell you what when it comes to trade and I just got a list of comes to trade and I just got a list of comes to Trade and I just got a list of companies that have left North Carolina companies that have left North Carolina companies that have left North Carolina and they've gone down to Mexico and it's - and they've gone down to Mexico and it's - and they've gone down to Mexico and It's - it's a disgrace, what's - what's happening, it's a disgrace, what's - what's happening, it's a disgrace.
What's - what's happening. It is a disgrace what's happening and it is a disgrace what's happening and it is a disgrace what's happening and we're gonna stop it and it's not going - we're gonna stop it and it's not going - we're gonna stop it and it's not going to Happen any longer we're losing our to happen any longer, we're losing our to happen any longer.
We're losing our jobs, we're losing our manufacturing jobs, we're losing our manufacturing jobs, we're losing our manufacturing. We're gonna stop the nonsense that's we're gonna stop. The nonsense that's we're gonna stop the nonsense that's going on and it's so easy to stop we going on and it's so easy to stop we going on and it's so easy to stop.
We will stop it so fast. Your heads will - will stop it so fast. Your heads will - will stop it so fast. Your heads will spin spin spin, remember that your heads will spin. So remember that your heads will spin. So remember that your heads will spin. So we'll talk a little bit about trade, we'll talk a little bit about trade, we'll talk a little bit about trade later.
It's so easy. The trade is so easy later, it's so easy. The trade is so easy later, it's so easy. The trade is so easy folks, it's so easy folks, it's so easy folks. It's so easy the trade of all of them, we're going to the trade of all of them. We're going to the trade of all of them. We're going to knock the hell out of Isis.
We have by knock the hell out of Isis. We have by knock the hell out of Isis. We have, by the way, by the way, the way - by the way, the way - by the way we have a president who's out, we have a president who's out. We have a president who's out campaigning for crooked, Hillary Clinton, campaigning for crooked, Hillary Clinton campaigning for crooked.
Hillary Clinton and he should be home working on Isis and he should be home working on Isis and he should be home working on Isis where the threat is getting worse and where the threat is getting worse and where the threat is getting worse and worse, he Should be working on trade he worse, he should be working on trade he worse.
He should be working on trade. He should be working on the borders. People should be working on the borders. People should be working on the borders. People are flowing into our country from lots are flowing into our country from lots are flowing into our country from lots of places, but from Syria, no more, no more of places.
But from Syria, no more, no more of places. But from Syria, no more, no more. Okay, they're not coming, no more. We don't - okay, they're not coming. No more. We don't, okay, they're not coming. No more. We don't know who they are. We don't know where know who they are. We don't know where know who they are.
We don't know where they come from. They have no - they come from, they have no, they come from, they have no documentation, they have no paperwork and documentation. They have no paperwork and documentation. They have no paperwork and who knows, who knows? But you know what, we - who knows, who knows, but you know what we, who knows, who knows, but you know what, we can't take any more chances folks.
We can't take any more chances. Folks. We can't take any more chances. Folks we can't take any more chances. Can't take any more, chances, can't take any more chances. If you look at - if you look at crooked, if you look at - if you look at crooked, if you look at - if you look at crooked, Hillary, she wants to increase the Hillary, she wants to increase the Hillary, she wants to increase the immigrants coming in from Syria, again, immigrants coming in from Syria, again, immigrants coming in from Syria again, they could be Isis.
This could be this - they could be Isis. This could be this - they could be Isis. This could be - this could be the all-time great Trojan horse could be the all-time great Trojan horse could be the all-time great Trojan horse. You know the story of the Trojan horse, you know the story of the Trojan horse, you know the story of the Trojan horse.
This could be the all-time great look at this could be the all-time great look at this could be the all-time great look at what yet one person, one person has done, what yet one person, one person has done what yet one person one person has done in Orlando, just take a look one person in Orlando, just take a look, one person in Orlando just take a look, one person look at the - the horror that that person look at the - the horror that that person look at the - the horror that that person has wreaked On our country, the gay has wreaked on our country.
The gay has wreaked on our country. The gay community, the LGBT community was just community. The LGBT community was just community. The LGBT community was just - they cannot - nobody can even fathom what they cannot. Nobody can even fathom what they cannot, nobody can even fathom what took place. That's one bad apple, we have took place, that's one bad.
Apple, we have took place, that's one bad apple, we have many people coming in and you know what many people coming in and you know what many people coming in and you know what, it just takes a small percentage, but it just takes a small percentage. But it just takes a small percentage, but there's something going on and guess there's something going on and guess there's something going on and guess what.
We have a leader that doesn't even what we have a leader that doesn't even what we have a leader that doesn't even want to discuss the name of the problem, want to discuss the name of the problem, want to discuss the name of the problem. And the problem is radical Islamic and the problem is radical Islamic.
And the problem is radical Islamic terrorism. And it's a problem. It's a terrorism and it's a problem, it's a terrorism and it's a problem. It's a problem problem problem. And we've got Hillary Clinton, who's weak. And we've got Hillary Clinton, who's weak, and we've got Hillary Clinton who's weak, who's ineffective, she'll never be able who's ineffective.
She'll never be able who's ineffective. She'll never be able to do the job. Her judgment is horrible to do the job. Her judgment is horrible to do the job. Her judgment is horrible. Look at her judgment on emails who would look at her judgment on emails who would look at her judgment on emails who would do it, do it, do it look at her judgment.
Her judgment is look at her judgment. Her judgment is look at her judgment. Her judgment is horrible, horrible, horrible. All right. Her judgment is horrible. Now all right, her judgment is horrible now all right, her judgment is horrible. Now who said that about Hillary Bernie, who said that about Hillary Bernie, who said that about Hillary, Bernie Sanders said her judgment is bad.
She's Sanders said her judgment is bad. She's Sanders said her judgment is bad. She's got bad judgment, okay. Now let me tell, got bad judgment, okay. Now let me tell, got bad judgment. Okay. Now let me tell you whether it's Isis, whether it's trade you, whether it's Isis, whether it's trade, you, whether it's Isis, whether it's trade, whether it's borders, whether it's jobs, whether it's borders, whether it's jobs, whether it's borders, whether it's jobs, it's going to be four more Years of the - it's going to be four more years of the - it's going to be four more years of the same thing.
The last thing we need is same thing. The last thing we need is same thing. The last thing we need is another Clinton or the last thing we - another Clinton or the last thing we - another Clinton or the last thing we need is an Obama Clinton in the White need is an Obama Clinton in the White need is an Obama Clinton.
In the White House, we have got a mess in this country House, we have got a mess in this country House. We have got a mess in this country. We own 19 trillion dollars, soon to be 21. We own 19 trillion dollars, soon to be 21. We own 19 trillion dollars, soon to be 21 trillion, the debt has doubled under trillion.
The debt has doubled under trillion. The debt has doubled under Obama, it's doubled way. Do you see we are Obama, it's doubled way. Do you see we are Obama, it's doubled way. Do you see - we are sitting on a mess and it's got to be sitting on a mess and it's got to be sitting on a mess and it's got to be taken care of.
And the way it gets taken, taken care of and the way it gets taken, taken care of and the way it gets taken care of at least that aspect of it is care of at least that aspect of it is care of at least that aspect of It is jobs. We're going to bring jobs back to jobs. We're going to bring jobs back to jobs.
We're going to bring jobs back to North Carolina. We're going to bring jobs North Carolina. We're going to bring jobs North Carolina. We're going to bring jobs back to our country. It's going to be back to our country. It's going to be back to our country. It's going to be America first, not all these other America first, not all these other America first, not all these other countries that don't give a damn about countries that don't give a damn about countries that don't give a damn about us.
It's going to be America first us. It's going to be America first us. It's going to be America first AMERICA, AMERICA, AMERICA, first AMERICA, AMERICA, AMERICA, first AMERICA, AMERICA, AMERICA first, we've got a person in the White House. We've got a person in the White House. We've got a person in the White House that's having a lot of fun, a lot of fun that's having a lot of fun, a lot of fun that's having a lot of fun, a lot of fun.
I watched him today. It's like a carnival. I watched him today. It's like a carnival, I watched him today. It's like a carnival act, a lot of fun moving around is the act a lot of fun moving around, is the act a lot of fun moving around is the whole thing you know? Great, great, great. Whole thing you know.
Great, great, great whole thing you know. Great, great, great. I'm saying this is a president we need a - I'm saying this is a president we need a - I'm saying this is a president. We need a president who's going to bring us back president who's going to bring us back president who's going to bring us back.
We need a president that's not going to - we need a president that's not going to - we need a president that's not going to be divisive. We need a president that's be divisive. We need a president that's be divisive. We need a president that's going to take care of the - going to take care of the - going to take care of the african-american community.
Remember that african-american community remember that african-american community remember that remember that Obama is all talk and no, remember that Obama is all talk and no, remember that Obama is all talk and no action action action. We need a president that's going to - we need a president that's going to - we need a president that's going to create jobs for Hispanics who don't have create jobs for Hispanics who don't have create jobs for Hispanics who don't have the jobs.
We need a president. That's the jobs we need, a president, that's the jobs we need, a president that's going to turn our country around and going to turn our country around and going to turn our country around and Obama cannot do it. And Hillary Clinton Obama cannot do it. And Hillary Clinton Obama cannot do it and Hillary Clinton will be even worse.
Believe me, she will - will be even worse. Believe me, she will - will be even worse. Believe me, she will be even worse. I mean I brought up be even worse. I mean, I brought up be even worse. I mean, I brought up something last night. I heard they're something last night. I heard they're something last night.
I heard they're flying down on Air Force One now Air flying down on Air Force One. Now Air flying down on Air Force One, now Air Force One is a very old Boeing 747 it Force. One is a very old Boeing 747 it Force. One is a very old Boeing 747. It sucks up a lot of gas. A lot of fuel, boy sucks up a lot of gas, a lot of fuel, boy sucks up a lot of gas, a lot of fuel, boy, the fuel bill, you turn on those engines, the fuel bill, you turn on those engines, the fuel bill, you turn on Those engines, I can tell you it's a lot of money.
I - I can tell you it's a lot of money. I - I can tell you it's a lot of money. I said. Let me ask you a question why is said, let me ask you a question. Why is said - let me ask you a question, why is she campaigning with the plane of the she campaigning with the plane of the she campaigning with the plane of the United States, United States, United States.
Why is she campaigning and why is he? Why is she campaigning and why is he - why is she campaigning and why is he allowed to come down, get on that very allowed to come down, get on that very allowed to come down, get on that very, very, very expensive plane. You know, he very, very expensive plane, you know he very, very expensive plane.
You know he cooks about the carbon footprint, okay. He cooks about the carbon footprint, okay. He cooks about the carbon footprint, okay. He wants to solve the carbon footprint, but wants to solve the carbon footprint, but wants to solve the carbon footprint. But he gets on an old Boeing 747 that he gets on an old Boeing 747 that he gets on an old Boeing 747 that spewing stuff into the air.
He gets her spewing stuff into the air. He gets her spewing stuff into the air. He gets her on the plane and then they say we will on the plane and then they say we will on the plane and then they say we will fight for the environment. We will fight, fight for the environment. We will fight, fight for the environment.
We will fight for the carbon footprint that he gets for the carbon footprint that he gets for the carbon footprint that he gets back into the Boeing 747 goes back to back into the Boeing 747, goes back to back into the Boeing 747, goes back to Washington. His greatest, his greatest was when he his greatest, his greatest was when he his greatest.
His greatest was when he wanted to play golf in Hawaii. So he wanted to play golf in Hawaii. So he wanted to play golf in Hawaii. So he takes the 747 and by the way he's played - takes the 747. And by the way, he's played - takes the 747. And by the way, he's played more rounds just about than people that more rounds just about than people that more rounds just about than people that play professionally.
On the PGA Tour, I play professionally on the PGA Tour. I play professionally on the PGA Tour. I mean, this guy and he gets on this plane mean this guy and he gets on this plane mean this guy and he gets on this plane, flies to Hawaii. He's there for a long flies to Hawaii. He's there for a long flies to Hawaii.
He's there for a long time time time golf, golf, golf, golf, more more learning, golf, golf, golf, golf, more, more learning, golf, golf, golf, golf, more, more learning how to chip learning how to hit the - how to chip learning how to hit the - how to chip learning. How to hit the drive learning at a putt drive learning at a putt drive learning at a putt, I want more our country's going to hell I want more our country's going to hell I want more.
Our country's going to hell. Isis is laughing at us. They're chopping - Isis is laughing at us. They're chopping. Isis is laughing at us. They're chopping off heads. They're drowning people in off heads. They're drowning people in off heads. They're drowning people in steel cages and he's out there playing steel cages and he's out there playing steel cages and he's out there playing golf with just about as long a trip as golf with just about as long a trip as golf with just about as long A trip as you can make from Washington then after you can make from Washington then after you can make from Washington then after a long extended vacation, he gets back on a long extended vacation.
He gets back on a long extended vacation. He gets back on the plane flies back, lands starts, the plane flies back, lands starts, the plane flies back, lands starts talking about the environment. Ok, give me talking about the environment. Ok, give me talking about the environment. Ok, give me a break folks, give me a break a break folks, give me a break a break folks, give me a break, give me up for it now you know we need give me up for it now.
You know, we need - give me up for it now, you know, we need unity of the Republican Party and I have unity of the Republican Party and I have unity of the Republican Party. And I have to be honest, I think I win without the - to be honest, I think I win without the - to be honest, I think I win without the unity, but we need unity in the unity, but we need unity in the unity.
But we need unity in the Republican Party and for the most part Republican Party and for the most part Republican Party. And for the most part, we have unity, we have some pretty good - we have unity, we have some pretty good - we have unity, we have some pretty good stuff and we have some great people like stuff and we have some great people like stuff and we have Some great people like Bob who just came up and so many others, Bob, who just came up and so many others, Bob, who just came up and so many others, so many senators, so many congressmen and so many senators, so many congressmen and so many senators.
So many congressmen and women, we have great people, but we need women, we have great people, but we need women, we have great people, but we need real unity and the leaders have to get real unity and the leaders have to get real unity and the leaders Have to get supportive and if they don't get supportive and if they don't get supportive and if they don't get supportive, we're gonna win anyway don't supportive.
We're gonna win anyway, don't supportive. We're gonna win anyway, don't worry about it, worry about it, worry about it. In fact, probably I do better without the - in fact probably I do better without the - in fact probably I do better without the kind of support that we're talking about kind of support that we're talking about kind of support that we're talking about because that's where I Am here in the - because that's where I am here in the - because that's where I am here in the first place, first place first place, that's why I'm here in the first place.
The conventions going to be terrific. We - the conventions going to be terrific. We - the conventions going to be terrific. We have great speakers, we have fantastic, have great speakers, we have fantastic, have great speakers, we have fantastic speakers. We have so many people that speakers we have so many people that speakers we have so many people that want to speak.
You know, they give us the want to speak, you know, they give us the want to speak, you know, they give us the tsavo. They don't have enough, we have so tsavo they don't have enough, we have so tsavo, they don't have enough. We have so many people that want to speak. I have many people that want to speak.
I have many people that want to speak. I have made so many enemies by saying I can't made so many enemies by saying I can't made so many enemies by saying I can't let you do it, but we want people that let you do it, but we want people that let you do it. But we want people that love our country and want to be there, love our country and want to be there, love our country and want to be there and that love our party party and if and that love our party party and if and that love our Party party and if they don't love our party, they shouldn't, they don't love our party, they shouldn't, they don't love our party, they shouldn't be there.
And let me just tell you one be there and let me just tell you one be there. And let me just tell you one little thing which turns out to be a big little thing, which turns out to be a big little thing, which turns out to be a big, big thing. Defense is always most big thing. Defense is always most big thing.
Defense is always most important, right? We have to defend our important right. We have to defend our important right. We have to defend our country. We're gonna have to build up our country. We're gonna have to build up our country. We're gonna have to build up our military again, it's really depleted.
It's military again. It's really depleted. It's military again. It's really depleted. It's in bad shape. We're gonna build it up in bad shape. We're gonna build it up in bad shape. We're gonna build it up, we're gonna take care of our vets like. We're gonna take care of our vets like we're gonna take care of our vets like you wouldn't believe because our vets you wouldn't believe because our vets you wouldn't believe because our vets are being mistreated horribly horribly, are being mistreated horribly horribly are being mistreated Horribly horribly our greatest people and we have a plan our greatest people and we have a plan our greatest people and we have a plan that's received universal, fantastic, that's received universal, fantastic, that's received universal fantastic reviews.
And I'm the only one you know I reviews and I'm the only one you know I reviews and I'm the only one. You know, I made a speech up in a great part of the - made a speech up in a great part of the - made a speech up in a great part of the world, okay? I won't even mention where world, okay, I won't even mention where world, okay.
I won't even mention where, but I made a speech and during the - but I made a speech and during the - but I made a speech and during the speech I said let's raise some money for speech. I said let's raise some money for speech. I said let's raise some money for the vets. We ended up raising 5.6 million.
The vets we ended up raising 5.6 million. The vets we ended up raising 5.6 million dollars for events. For this, I gave a dollars for events for this. I gave a dollars for events for this, I gave a million and we ended up, I could have million and we ended up, I could have million and we ended up, I could have just made a speech and left and the just made a speech and left And the just made a speech and left and the press comes down well, he should have press comes down.
Well, he should have press comes down. Well, he should have given here. He should have given a faster given here. He should have given a faster given here. He should have given a faster, he said we have to vet the vets. You know, he said we have to vet the vets. You know, he said we have to vet the vets.
You know that right there. Groups who knows, we that right there groups, who knows? We that right there groups who knows, we have to check them out, but anyway we have to check them out. But anyway we have to check them out. But anyway, we raised 5.6 million dollars for the vets, raised 5.6 million dollars for the vets, raised 5.6 million dollars for the vets.
I am so proud of it. I love the vets I - I am so proud of it. I love the vets I - I am so proud of it. I love the vets. I have received more accolades from the - have received more accolades from the - have received more accolades from the groups. We're sending groups have never groups, we're sending groups, have never groups.
We're sending groups have never had money, a hundred thousand, two hundred had money, a hundred thousand, two hundred had money, a hundred thousand, two hundred thousand in one case 1.1 million in thousand, in one case 1.1 million in thousand, in one case 1.1 million. In another case. Two, fifty seventy-five another case, two, fifty seventy-five, another case, two fifty, seventy-five thousand, fifty thousand, all of these thousand, fifty thousand all of these thousand, fifty thousand all of these groups, I don't know, 30-something groups, groups, I don't know, 30-something groups, groups, I don't know, 30-something groups.
It was so beautiful to see I you all of it was so beautiful to see I you all of it was so beautiful to see. I you - all of us, we have received accolades and I say us, we have received accolades and I say us, we have received accolades and I say all of us because this is a movement all of us because this is a movement.
All of us, because this is a movement folks, this is not like a normal folks, this is not like a normal folks. This is not like a normal situation. Look at this room, look at the situation, look at this room, look at the situation, look at this room, look at the size of this and there are thousands of people and I - and there are thousands of people and I - and there are thousands of people.
And I got wiped out getting off the plane, it got wiped out getting off the plane, it got wiped out getting off the plane, it was raining and windy. And I want to tell was raining and windy and I want to tell was raining and windy. And I want to tell you it's actually beautiful, beautiful you - it's actually beautiful, beautiful you - it's actually beautiful, beautiful.
And now you know it's my hair because and now you know it's my hair because and now you know it's my hair because any hair that could withstand that win any hair that could withstand that win any hair that could withstand that win. The pilot, it is my head. The pilot said the pilot, it is my head. The pilot said the pilot.
It is my head. The pilot said sir, I'd wait about 10 to 20 minutes, sir. I'd wait about 10 to 20 minutes, sir. I'd wait about 10 to 20 minutes before you get out of the plane. I said before you get out of the plane, I said before you get out of the plane, I said, why is it 35, 40 mile an hour gusts? Why is it 35, 40 mile?
An hour gusts, why is it 35, 40 mile an hour gusts raining? I said no, we got it. We're not raining. I said no, we got it. We're not raining. I said no, we got it. We're not going to keep you - you - you, you - you. It's nice. When you don't have to care, it's nice when you don't have to care. It's nice when you don't have to care.
But I don't care what I care. But I'd lost, I mean, if you think about - but I'd lost, I mean, if you think about - but I'd lost. I mean, if you think about it, the apprentice, I mean, not small stuff, it - the apprentice, I mean, not small stuff, it the apprentice. I mean not small stuff, it's big show they came to me, they said it's big show, they came to me, they said it's big show, they came to me, they said we want to renew two more seasons.
We - we want to renew two more seasons. We - we want to renew two more seasons, we want to renew you and we'll pay you want to renew you and we'll pay you want to renew you and we'll pay you anything if they did. It's a lot of money. Anything if they did, it's a lot of money, anything if they did, it's a lot of money in that stuff when you have a charge and in that stuff, when you have a charge and in that stuff, when you have a charge and fourteen seasons of The Apprentice I fourteen seasons of The Apprentice.
I fourteen seasons of The Apprentice. I said to the head person had Comcast who said to the head person had Comcast who said to the head person had Comcast who doesn't matter to me. Steve Burke, I said doesn't matter to me. Steve Burke, I said doesn't matter to me. Steve Burke, I said Steve, I'm gonna run for president.
No, no, Steve, I'm gonna run for president. No, no, Steve, I'm gonna run for president. No, no, no, you're not. You got to do the approach. No, you're not. You got to do the approach. No, you're not. You got to do the approach. I said no, I'm gonna run for president. I said no, I'm gonna run for president.
I said no, I'm gonna run for president, you can't do both. You're not allowed - you can't do both. You're not allowed - you can't do both. You're not allowed equal time. It's called equal time laws. I equal time it's called equal time laws. I equal time it's called equal time laws. I said Steve, I'm gonna run for president said Steve, I'm gonna run for president, said Steve, I'm gonna run for president at least.
I'm pretty sure because that at least I'm pretty sure because that at least I'm pretty sure because that was three months before cuz I want to was three months before cuz I want to was three months before cuz I want to tell you, it takes guts to Do what we're tell you, it takes guts to do what we're tell you, it takes guts to do what we're all doing, but it takes guts to do what all doing.
But it takes guts to do what all doing. But it takes guts to do what I'm doing. Believe me, it takes guts, not - I'm doing - believe me, it takes guts, not - I'm doing - believe me, it takes guts, not easy. You get hit by dishonesty and not easy. You get hit by dishonesty and not easy. You get hit by dishonesty and not all reporters a bit.
Some are terrific. All reporters a bit, some are terrific. All reporters a bit, some are terrific, some are honest and honorable and good. Some are honest and honorable and good, some are honest and honorable and good. And professional, but a lot of them are and professional, but a lot of them are and professional, but a lot of them are terrible.
You get hit from 15 different, terrible. You get hit from 15 different, terrible. You get hit from 15 different directions on stuff that's very unfair, directions on stuff that's very unfair, directions on stuff that's very unfair to be hit with. You get hit in so many to be hit with. You get hit in so many to be hit with.
You get hit in so many different ways and it started off with different ways and it started off with different ways and it started off with 17 people and then it gets down to one 17 people. And then it gets down to one 17 people and then it gets down to one, they made the right choice. Am I doing a - they made the right choice?
Am I doing a - they made the right choice? Am I doing a good job? By the way, I might be a good good job by the way. I might be a good good job by the way. I might be a good time because I'm a messenger, you know time because I'm a messenger, you know time because I'm a messenger, you know, essentially essentially I'm your essentially essentially I'm your essentially essentially I'm your messenger, the - the message is simple messenger.
The - the message is simple messenger, the - the message is simple. We're going to take our country back. We're going to take our country back. We're going to take our country back. We're gonna have everybody included. We're gonna have everybody included, we're gonna have - everybody included folks. We want to include everybody.
We folks, we want to include everybody. We folks, we want to include everybody, we want to help African American youth, we want to help African American youth. We want to help African American youth, we want to help African Americans. We want want to help African Americans. We want want to help African Americans, we want to help Hispanics Latinos, we want to, to help Hispanics Latinos, we want to, to help Hispanics Latinos.
We want to help everybody. We've got to help help everybody. We've got to help help everybody. We've got to help everybody. We've got to bring our country, everybody. We've got to bring our country, everybody we've got to bring our country together. We've got to bring our country together, we've got to bring our country together, we've got to bring our country together so important when you look at together so important when you look at together so important, when you look at what's going on and then you look at What's going on and then you look at what's going on and then you look at what's going on with Isis, where they're - what's going on with Isis, where they're - what's going on with Isis, where they're blowing up airplanes, where they're doing blowing up airplanes, where they're doing Blowing up airplanes where they're doing things that are just inconceivable that things that are just inconceivable that things that are just inconceivable that hasn't happened to medieval times.
I mean hasn't happened to medieval times. I mean hasn't happened to medieval times. I mean, we studied history and we loved history, we studied history and we loved history. We studied history and we loved history. I loved history chopping off heads. I loved history chopping off heads. I loved history chopping off heads that's medieval times today.
It's like a - that's medieval times today. It's like a - that's medieval times today. It's like a common occurrence and these are animals, common occurrence and these are animals, common occurrence and these are animals, these are animals that have to be - these are animals that have to be - these are animals that have to be stopped.
And I - and I was against the war in Iraq now I and I was against the war in Iraq. Now I and I was against the war in Iraq. Now I was a civilian, I'm a businessman, it was - was a civilian, I'm a businessman, it was - was a civilian, I'm a businessman, it was a long time ago. But I was against it I a long time ago.
But I was against it I a long time ago, but I was against it. I was always against it. I didn't want to was always against it. I didn't want to was always against it. I didn't want to go the war in Iraq. I said, I think you're go the war in Iraq. I said I think you're go the war in Iraq. I said I think you're gonna destabilize the Middle East.
I gonna destabilize the Middle East, I gonna destabilize the Middle East. I think you're going to have a lot of think you're going to have a lot of think you're going to have a lot of problems who wouldn't know this is going problems who wouldn't know this is going problems who wouldn't know this is going to happen.
And on top of everything else to happen and on top of everything else to happen and on top of everything else, what else did we get out other than a - what else did we get out other than a - what else did we get out other than a Total destabilization a total mess, total destabilization a total mess, total destabilization a total mess, thousands and thousands of our lives and thousands and thousands of our lives and thousands and thousands of our lives and other lives their lives, thousands and other lives their lives, thousands and other Lives their lives, thousands and thousands of our young people's lives, thousands of our young people's lives, thousands of our young people's lives destroyed tens of thousands of wounded destroyed, tens of thousands of wounded destroyed, tens of thousands of wounded where they're wounded.
So gravely that where they're wounded so gravely that where they're wounded so gravely that the bravest people I've ever seen, they - the bravest people I've ever seen, they - the bravest people I've ever seen, they have a better attitude in life than I do have a better attitude In life than I do have a better attitude in life than I do some of these people, they have the best, some of these people, they have the best, some of these people, they have the best attitude I've ever seen.
I work with them attitude I've ever seen. I work with them attitude I've ever seen, I work with them, we help them and they have the best, we help them and they have the best, we help them and they have the best attitude I've ever seen. I've never seen attitude I've ever seen. I've never seen attitude I've ever seen.
I've never seen anything like it. I'm serious. They have a anything like it. I'm serious, they have a anything like it. I'm serious. They have a better attitude about life, in some cases better attitude about life, in some cases better attitude about life in some cases than I do. These are amazing, amazing than I do.
These are amazing, amazing than I do. These are amazing, amazing people. We shouldn't have done it, but people we shouldn't have done it, but people we shouldn't have done it. But what did we get out of it? We got Isis on what did we get out of it? We got Isis on. What did we get out of it? We got Isis on top of everything else now.
We have a top of everything else now. We have a top of everything else now. We have a president that doesn't know what the president that doesn't know what the president that doesn't know what the hell he's doing. He doesn't have a clue. Hell, he's doing - he doesn't have a clue. Hell, he's doing - he doesn't have a clue folks.
And instead of staying there with folks and instead of staying there with folks and instead of staying there with a fairly small force, he announces to the a fairly small force. He announces to the a fairly small force he announces to the world. He's going to take everybody out world. He's going to take everybody out world.
He's going to take everybody out and they'll be out by a certain date and - and they'll be out by a certain date and - and they'll be out by a certain date. And the only thing that was a little - the only thing that was a little - the only thing that was a little surprising is the enemy didn't believe surprising is the enemy.
Didn't believe surprising is the enemy. Didn't believe him because they said nobody could be him because they said nobody could be him because they said nobody could be that stupid to announce that we're going that stupid to announce that we're going that stupid to announce that we're going to be out on a Certain date and then that day came and we were gone and then that day came and we were gone and then that day came and we were gone.
We were gone, we shouldn't have been - we were gone, we shouldn't have been - we were gone, we shouldn't have been there there there. We shouldn't have destabilized Saddam. We shouldn't have destabilized Saddam we shouldn't have destabilized. Saddam Hussein was a bad guy, right? He was a bad Hussein was a bad guy, right?
He was a bad Hussein was a bad guy, right? He was a bad guy, really bad guy. But you know what he guy really bad guy, but you know what he guy really bad guy, but you know what he did well, did well, did well, he killed terrorists, he did that. So good, he killed terrorists, he did that so good. He killed terrorists, he did that.
So good. They didn't read him the rights. They - they didn't read him the rights. They - they didn't read him the rights, they didn't talk. They were a terrorist who's didn't talk - they were a terrorist who's didn't talk, they were a terrorist who's over today. Iraq is Harvard for terrorism over today.
Iraq is Harvard for terrorism over today. Iraq is Harvard for terrorism. You want to be a terrorist, you go to - you want to be a terrorist, you go to - you want to be a terrorist, you go to Iraq, Iraq, Iraq, it's like Harvard, okay. So sad, so sad, so sad, so sad, so sad, so sad, okay. So sad and we're gonna take care of, okay, so sad and we're gonna take care of, okay, so sad and we're gonna take care of it folks, we have no choice, we have no it folks, we have no choice, we have no it folks We have no choice, we have no choice.
It was when they cut off the choice, it was when they cut off the choice, it was when they cut off the heads. Initially, we were all amazed heads. Initially, we were all amazed heads. Initially, we were all amazed. I think they overplayed their hand and I think they overplayed their hand and I think they overplayed their hand.
And if they didn't, then we are all fools. If they didn't, then we are all fools. If they didn't, then we are all fools because we cannot let them get away with, because we cannot let them get away with, because we cannot let them get away with what they're doing right now. Terrorizing what they're doing right now, terrorizing what they're doing right now.
Terrorizing the world we're gonna be so strong, we're the world we're gonna be so strong. We're the world we're gonna be so strong. We're gonna be so tough. We're gonna be so gonna be so tough, we're gonna be. So gonna be so tough, we're gonna be so vicious and we're gonna knock them for a vicious and we're gonna knock them for a vicious and we're gonna knock them for a loop, we have no choice.
So I just want to - I wrote some notes, so I just want to - I wrote some notes. So I just want to - I wrote some notes coming in the plane because I was coming in the plane because I was coming in the plane because I was watching this tragedy that took place, watching this tragedy that took place, watching this tragedy that took place today.
And over the last few days, it's a today and over the last few days, it's a today and over the last few days, it's a tragedy because we're a country of law tragedy because we're a country of law tragedy because we're a country of law, we're a Country of order, other people, we're a country of order, other people, we're a country of order, other people have been so badly hurt by doing things have been so badly hurt by doing things have been so badly hurt by doing things so much less than crooked Hillary.
So much less than crooked, Hillary, so much less than crooked, Hillary Clinton, so much less, right, so much less Clinton, so much less, right, so much less Clinton, so much less, right, so much less. I mean, you look at so many people have - I mean, you look at so many people have - I mean you look at so many people have suffered.
So gravely for doing so much suffered. So gravely for doing so much suffered. So gravely for doing so much less now, does that mean that we expunge less now, does that mean that we expunge less now, does that mean that we expunge their record? Does that mean that we say their record, does that mean that we say their record?
Does that mean that we say all of you people that have been so all of you people that have been so all of you people that have been so guilty for so many years we can no guilty for so many years we can no guilty for. So many years we can no longer accept that as a ruling because longer accept that as a ruling because longer accept that as a ruling because what we've done for her and she was so what we've done for her and she was.
So what we've done for her and she was so much worse than anybody that we're much worse than anybody that we're much worse than anybody that we're talking about. Does that mean that we talking about, does that mean that we talking about? Does that mean that we have to exonerate everybody, we have to have to exonerate everybody.
We have to have to exonerate everybody. We have to take back the punishment that we gave, take back the punishment that we gave, take back the punishment that we gave them because we have a country that's them because we have a country that's them because we have a country that's supposed to be fair. And when you hear supposed to be fair and when you hear supposed to be fair and when you hear what was said by the FBI director today, what was said by the FBI director today, what was said by the FBI director today and you listen, you listen To what he and you listen, you listen to what he and you listen, you listen to what he said and in the middle of it he was said and in the middle of it he was said and in the middle of it he was talking about.
So many different things talking about so many different things talking about so many different things he talked about extremely careless she he talked about extremely careless she he talked about extremely careless, she was extremely careless that's a was extremely careless that's a was extremely careless.
That's a tremendous word. You didn't have to be tremendous word. You didn't have to be tremendous word. You didn't have to be careless. You didn't even have to really careless. You didn't even have to really careless. You didn't even have to really know that what you were doing was wrong. Know that what you were doing was wrong, know that what you were doing was wrong and you're guilty because we're talking and you're guilty because we're talking and you're guilty because we're talking about serious stuff.
We're talking about about serious stuff. We're talking about about serious stuff. We're talking about the lifeblood of our country. We're the lifeblood of our country. We're the lifeblood of our country. We're talking about the safety of our people, talking about the safety of our people, talking about the safety of our people.
The laws are very explicit. Stupidity is - the laws are very explicit, stupidity is - the laws are very explicit. Stupidity is not a reason that you're going to be not a reason that you're going to be not a reason that you're going to be innocent, okay. It's not a race and I don't happen to believe that it and I don't happen to believe that it and I don't happen to believe that it was stupidity.
Okay. Was stupidity. Okay. Was stupidity okay. But even stupidity is not a reason and but even stupidity is not a reason and but even stupidity is not a reason and boy, what they've done. So I wrote this boy what they've done. So I wrote this boy what they've done. So I wrote this out and I'm gonna read some of it to you out and I'm gonna read some of it to you out and I'm gonna read some of it to you.
And I think it makes sense. And I think - and I think it makes sense and I think - and I think it makes sense and I think it's important for us to understand, it's important for us to understand. It's important for us to understand today is the best evidence ever that today is the best evidence ever that today is the best evidence ever that we've seen that our system is absolutely we've seen that our system is absolutely we've seen that our system is absolutely totally Rigged, it's rigged, and I used that term initially when I - and I used that term initially when I - and I used that term initially when I was running in the Republican primaries was running in the Republican primaries was running in the Republican primaries.
And I was the first to use it then all and I was the first to use it then all and I was the first to use it. Then all of a sudden, it became a hot term of a sudden it became a hot term of a sudden it became a hot term. Everybody was using the word Gregg, Gregg, everybody was using the word Gregg, Gregg, everybody was using the word Gregg, Gregg, Gregg.
But if you remember, I Dwane Gregg, but if you remember, I Dwane Gregg. But if you remember, I Dwane Louisiana and I find out I didn't get Louisiana and I find out, I didn't get Louisiana and I find out I didn't get enough delegates what happened and enough delegates what happened and enough delegates what happened and places like Colorado, which Was so good places like Colorado, which was so good places like Colorado, which was so good to me, but all of a sudden we find out to me, but all of a sudden we find out to me.
But all of a sudden, we find out that they don't have the vote and other that they don't have the vote and other that they don't have the vote and other things. Okay, things okay, things okay. I used the word great and frankly I'll - I used the word great and frankly I'll - I used the word great and frankly I'll be honest if I didn't win in landslides be honest if I didn't win in landslides be honest, if I didn't win in landslides, I Wouldn't be standing up here, you'd be - I wouldn't be standing up here, you'd be - I wouldn't be standing up here.
You'd be watching some politician who would lose, watching some politician who would lose, watching some politician who would lose to Hillary Clinton, okay. Believe me to Hillary Clinton, okay. Believe me to Hillary Clinton, okay. Believe me, believe me, I started winning, I learned, believe me, I started winning, I learned, believe me, I started winning, I learned about rigged very fast.
I learned, but I about rigged very fast, I learned. But I about rigged very fast, I learned, but I used the term rigged, then all of a used, the term rigged, then all of a used, the term rigged, then all of a sudden Bernie started using it and other sudden Bernie started using it and other sudden Bernie started using it and other people now everyone talks about rigged people.
Now everyone talks about rigged people. Now everyone talks about rigged, but I'm gonna keep using it because I - but I'm gonna keep using it because I - but I'm gonna keep using it because I was the one that brought it up and I'm was the one that brought it up. And I'm was the one that brought it up and I'm the one, and I asked a couple of the one and I asked a couple of the one and I asked a couple of political pros you ever hear that word political pros, you ever hear that word.
Political pros you ever hear that word rigged, it's a rigged, everything and they rigged, it's a rigged, everything and they rigged, it's a rigged, everything and they really hasn't been thing used. I guess it really hasn't been thing used. I guess it really hasn't been thing used. I guess it has to be somewhere along the line, but has to be somewhere along the line, but has to be somewhere along the line.
But it hasn't. But think of Bernie Sanders, it hasn't. But think of Bernie Sanders, it hasn't. But think of Bernie Sanders, who's the most angry about this, I think who's the most angry about this. I think who's the most angry about this. I think the one with the most to lose is Bernie. The one with the most to lose is Bernie.
The one with the most to lose is Bernie Sanders because honestly he was waiting Sanders because honestly he was waiting Sanders because honestly he was waiting for the FBI primary and guess what he for the FBI primary and guess what he for the FBI primary. And guess what he just lost today, the FBI primary he lost just lost today.
The FBI primary he lost just lost today. The FBI primary, he lost the FBI primary, Bernie, my poor Bernie Oh, the FBI primary, Bernie, my poor Bernie Oh, the FBI primary Bernie. My poor Bernie - Oh, Bernie, Bernie, Bernie, I feel so badly for birdie, but you know I feel so badly for birdie, but you know I feel so badly for birdie, but you know what a lot of Bernie Sanders supporters, what a lot of Bernie Sanders supporters, what A lot of Bernie Sanders supporters are gonna be voting for Trump because are gonna be voting for Trump because are gonna be voting for Trump?
Because Bernie Sanders was right, Bernie Sanders was right. Bernie Sanders was right. Bernie Sanders was right about a couple. Bernie Sanders was right about a couple. Bernie Sanders was right about a couple of things. He's right about the system of things. He's right about the system of things. He's right about the system being rigged, but he's also right about being rigged.
But he's also right about being rigged, but he's also right about trade. Our trade deals are a disaster trade. Our trade deals are a disaster trade. Our trade deals are a disaster. They're killing our jobs. They're killing, they're killing our jobs. They're killing, they're killing our jobs. They're killing our families.
They're killing our incomes, our families, they're killing our incomes, our families, they're killing our incomes. I mean, people in this room, many people, I mean, people in this room, many people. I mean, people in this room, many people in this room. And I'm gonna fight for you in this room and I'm gonna fight for you in this room.
And I'm gonna fight for you because it's gonna be changed fast, many because it's gonna be changed fast, many because it's gonna be changed fast. Many people in this room are making less. People in this room are making less. People in this room are making less money today than they made 18 years ago, money today than they made 18 years ago, money today than they made 18 years ago effectively.
And they're working two jobs effectively and they're working two jobs effectively and they're working two jobs instead of one. And as horrible stupid instead of one and as horrible stupid instead of one. And as horrible, stupid Obamacare is a killer, which is giving Obamacare is a killer, which is giving Obamacare is a killer, which is giving them part-time employment when they them part-time employment, when they them part-time employment, when they never had part-time employment in their - never had part-time Employment in their never had part-time employment in their lives and the premiums are through the lives and the premiums are through the lives and the premiums are through the roof and the deductibles are so high roof and the deductibles are so high roof and the deductibles are So high that you'll never be able to use it, that you'll never be able to use it, that you'll never be able to use it unless you die a very vicious long, slow unless you die a very vicious long, slow unless you die a very vicious long, Slow death, okay, and it's going to explode in death, okay?
And it's going to explode in death, okay? And it's going to explode in 17 anyway. And we're going to replace it 17 anyway and we're going to replace it 17 anyway and we're going to replace it before it explodes and we're going to before it explodes and we're going to before it explodes and we're going to replace it with something that's great Replace it with something that's great, replace it with something that's great and that's less expensive both for - and that's less expensive both for - and that's less expensive both for yourselves and for the country.
It's - it's yourselves and for the country, it's - it's yourselves and for the country. It's - it's a horror show, it's that you have to see a horror show. It's that you have to see a horror show. It's that you have to see that. What I'm hearing in Texas going that what I'm hearing in Texas going that what I'm hearing in Texas going through Obamacare, Blue Cross, Blue Shield through Obamacare, Blue Cross Blue Shield through Obamacare, Blue Cross Blue Shield, raised 60 %. You saw that last week a 60 % raised 60 %. You saw that last week a 60 % raised 60 %. You saw that last week a 60 % increase in premiums.
Blue Cross Blue increase in premiums, Blue Cross Blue increase in premiums, Blue Cross Blue Shield through Obamacare. Now I hear that Shield through Obamacare. Now I hear that Shield through Obamacare. Now I hear that on November 1st, they're going to have an - on November 1st, they're going to have an - on November 1st, they're going to have an increase on Obamacare in health care, increase on Obamacare in health care, increase on Obamacare in health care.
That is going to set this country in that is going to set this country in that is going to set this country in motion and I mean motion in a bad way. And what they want to do is they don't. And what they want to do is they don't. And what they want to do is they don't want to take those numbers and move them, want to take those numbers and move them, want to take those numbers and move them from November first to anytime after the - from November first to anytime after the - from November First to anytime after the election and we're not going to let them election and we're not going to let them election and we're not going to let them get away with it.
Folks. We're not gonna get away with it. Folks. We're not gonna get away with it folks. We're not gonna laugh. So as I said today is the best laugh. So as I said today is the best laugh. So as I said today is the best evidence we've ever seen that our system evidence we've ever seen that our system evidence we've ever seen that our system is totally rigged.
Hillary Clinton put is totally rigged. Hillary Clinton put is totally rigged. Hillary Clinton put the entire country in danger, put the the entire country in danger, put the the entire country in danger, put the entire country in danger and Benghazi entire country in danger and Benghazi entire country in danger and Benghazi and Benghazi and plenty of other things.
And Benghazi and plenty of other things. And Benghazi and plenty of other things, by the way, it was confirmed today that by the way it was confirmed today that by the way it was confirmed today that she routinely sent classified emails on. She routinely sent classified emails on. She routinely sent classified emails on an insecure private server that could be an insecure private server that could be an insecure private server that could be easily hacked by hostile foreign agents, easily hacked by hostile foreign agents, easily hacked by hostile foreign agents.
And we learned that people, she emailed and we learned that people she emailed and we learned that people she emailed were hacked and probably I think maybe were hacked and probably I think maybe were hacked and probably I think maybe definitely were hacked by these hostile definitely Were hacked by these hostile definitely were hacked by these hostile actors and these are dead but very, very actors and these are dead but very, very actors and these are dead but very, very smart people, a hell of a lot smarter, smart people, a hell of a Lot smarter, smart people, a hell of a lot smarter than what we have in Washington that I than what we have in Washington that I than what we have in Washington that I can tell you our enemies may have a blackmail file on our enemies, may have A blackmail file on our enemies may have a blackmail file on crooked Hillary, and this alone means crooked Hillary and this alone means crooked Hillary.
And this alone means that she should not be allowed to serve that she should not be allowed to serve that. She should not be allowed to serve as president of the United States. We now as president of the United States, we now as president of the United States, we now know this wrote this out. We now know, know this wrote this out.
We now know, know this wrote this out. We now know that she lied to the country when she - that she lied to the country when she that she lied to the country. When she said she did not send classified said she did not send classified said she did not send classified information on her server, she lied.
She sent vast amounts of classified. She sent vast amounts of classified. She sent vast amounts of classified information, including information information, including information information, including information classified as top secret top secret, okay classified as top secret, top secret, okay, classified as top secret top secret, okay?
And this is where they said that she was and this is where they said that she was and this is where they said that she was extremely careless and frankly I say extremely careless and frankly I say extremely careless and frankly I say grossly incompetent she will Be such a grossly incompetent, she will be such a grossly incompetent.
She will be such a lousy president folks so said okay, the lousy president folks so said okay, the lousy president folks so said okay, the lives of the American people were put at lives of the American people were put at lives of the American people were put At risk by Hillary Clinton, so that she risk by Hillary Clinton so that she risk by Hillary Clinton so that she could carry on her corrupt financial could carry on her corrupt financial could carry on her corrupt financial dealings.
Probably that's probably why dealings probably that's probably why dealings probably that's probably why she didn't want people to see what the - she didn't want people to see what the - she didn't want people to see what the hell she was doing. She went to hell she was doing, she went to hell she was doing.
She went to extraordinary lengths to carry out an extraordinary lengths to carry out an extraordinary lengths to carry out an Enron cell purge of her emails, 33,000 Enron cell purge of her emails, 33,000 Enron cell purge of her emails. 33,000 emails are missing and they say, oh, she's, emails are missing and they say, oh, she's, emails are missing and they say, oh, she's fine, she's fun 33,000 and I've always fine.
She's fun 33,000 and I've always fine. She's fun 33,000 and I've always been told you can't really get rid of an been told you can't really get rid of an been told you can't really get rid of an email. Have you ever heard this that if email have you ever heard this that if email have you ever heard this, that if we have the real super geniuses that we have the real super geniuses that we have the real super geniuses that know this stuff.
They say you can't get know this stuff, they say you can't get know this stuff. They say you can't get rid of emails, but we didn't use them rid of emails, but we didn't use them rid of emails, but we didn't use them because they didn't want to use them because they didn't want to use them because they didn't want to use Them they didn't want to use them, so like a, they didn't want to use them.
So like a, they didn't want to use them. So like a criminal with a guilty conscience criminal with a guilty conscience criminal with a guilty conscience. Clinton had her lawyers delete destroy Clinton, had her lawyers delete destroy Clinton, had her lawyers delete, destroy and wipe away forever, except I still say and wipe away forever, except I still say and wipe away forever, except I still say there are geniuses that can find them There are geniuses that can find them there are geniuses that can find them 30,000. Think of this 30,000 emails this 30,000. Think of this 30,000 emails this 30,000. Think of this 30,000 emails.
This again disqualifies her from service and again disqualifies her from service and again disqualifies her from service and just think of it, I mean, how can you have just think of it, I mean, how can you have just think of it, I mean, how can you have This we know now that these deletions, we know now that these deletions, we know now that these deletions included emails that were work related.
Included emails that were work related included emails that were work related, one more big fat, beautiful lie by one, more big fat, beautiful lie by one more big fat, beautiful lie by crooked Hillary, any government employee, crooked, Hillary, any government employee, crooked Hillary, any government employee who Engaged in this kind of behavior who engaged in this kind of behavior who engaged in this kind of behavior would be barred from handling classified, would be barred from handling classified, would be barred from handling classified information.
Again, that alone information again that alone information again that alone disqualifies her and again disqualifies her and again disqualifies her. And again, Bernie Sanders talked about bad bad. Bernie Sanders talked about bad bad. Bernie Sanders talked about bad, bad judgment, but he's not happy tonight judgment, but he's not happy tonight judgment, but he's not happy tonight, folks, because now it looks like it's folks because now it looks like it's folks because now it looks like it's over for Bernie.
But you know what I have over for Bernie, but you know what I have over for Bernie, but you know what, I have a feeling. They're gonna have a lot of a feeling. They're gonna have a lot of a feeling. They're gonna have a lot of people marching on Philadelphia, let's people marching on Philadelphia, let's people marching on Philadelphia, let's see what happens, okay, let's see.
I don't see what happens, okay, let's see. I don't see what happens. Okay, let's see. I don't know about you. But I always felt that know about you, but I always felt that know about you, but I always felt that Hillary Clinton would escape criminal Hillary Clinton would escape criminal Hillary Clinton would escape criminal charges for her dangerous and illegal charges for her dangerous and illegal charges.
For her dangerous and illegal behavior, because I always knew and I behavior because I always knew and I behavior because I always knew and I always see and it's so sad that our always see and it's so sad that our always see and it's so sad that Our system is, in fact, rigged system is in fact, rigged system is in fact rigged.
It's totally rigged, okay? It's corrupt. It's totally rigged, okay? It's corrupt. It's totally rigged, okay? It's corrupt, it's rigged, it's disgraceful. You have a - it's rigged, it's disgraceful. You have a - it's rigged, it's disgraceful. You have a statement made today at 11 o'clock then statement made today at 11 o'clock then statement made today at 11 o'clock.
Then you have a big speech by the president. You have a big speech by the president. You have a big speech by the president flying in on Air Force One with Hillary flying in on Air Force One with Hillary flying in on Air Force One with Hillary Clinton. A few hours later, even though we Clinton a few hours later, even though we Clinton a few hours later, even though we have more people here than they do, but have more people here than they do, but have more people here than they do.
But we won't say that we won't say that we won't say that. So the AG met with the president had to - so the AG met with the president had to - so the AG met with the president had to before the announcement. I mean how about before the announcement, I mean how about before the announcement, I mean how about that met with president -- builtin how that met with president -- builtin how that met with president -- builtin how about that deal right about that deal Right about that deal, right?
He's waiting around. He's waiting at the - he's waiting around. He's waiting at the - he's waiting around. He's waiting at the airport. Oh! Oh! Look, the AG's come, oh, airport, oh, oh, look, the AG's come, oh, airport? Oh, oh! Look, the AG's come. Oh, let me go say hello. Let me go say hello. Let me go say hello 39 minutes.
I'm gonna talk about the 39 minutes. I'm gonna talk about the 39 minutes. I'm gonna talk about the grandkids. He's got - I hear they're grandkids, he's got - I hear they're grandkids, he's got - I hear they're beautiful. I hear they're beautiful, get beautiful. I hear they're beautiful, get beautiful. I hear they're beautiful, get now.
I have eight grandchildren and I now I have eight grandchildren. And I now I have eight grandchildren and I will tell you I can talk about them and will tell you I can talk about them and will tell you I can talk about them. And after I say is it G beautiful, isn't it after I say? Is it G beautiful, isn't it after I say?
Is it G beautiful, isn't it beautiful? I love this. I love the kid. I beautiful. I love this, I love the kid. I beautiful. I love this, I love the kid I love you, but after about a minute I love you, but after about a minute I love you. But after about a minute, I can't go much longer. I want to get the - can't go much longer.
I want to get the - can't go much longer. I want to get the business right for you. I want to get the business right for you. I want to get the business right for you. I want to get the business, but he didn't talk about he business. But he didn't talk about he business, but he didn't talk about - he talked about golf, okay.
So he talked - talked about golf, okay. So he talked - talked about golf, okay. So he talked about the grandkids and I would say that about the grandkids. And I would say that about the grandkids and I would say that would take anywhere from 30 seconds to a - would take anywhere from 30 seconds to a would take anywhere from 30 seconds to a minute.
Minute minute. Seriously. Am I right that make you know? Seriously? Am I right that make you know seriously, am I right that make you know how long can you talk miss attorney, how long can you talk miss attorney, how long can you talk miss attorney general, I have the most beautiful general, I have the most beautiful general.
I have the most beautiful grandchildren you've ever seen. Let me grandchildren. You've ever seen. Let me grandchildren. You've ever seen. Let me show you a picture isn't that great. Let show you a picture, isn't that great. Let show you a picture, isn't that great. Let me show you another picture. What do you me show you another picture?
What do you me show you another picture? What do you think? I think they're beautiful and they're great, they're great. Now he's - and they're great, they're great. Now he's - and they're great, they're great. Now he's starting to run out of words, that's 37 starting to run out of words. That's 37 starting to run out of words.
That's 37. Now he's going to talk about golf. Now he's going to talk about golf. Now he's going to talk about golf. I don't worry about golf than he does. I don't worry about golf than he does. I don't worry about golf than he does. You can't talk about golf that way. It. You can't talk about golf that way.
It - you can't talk about golf that way. It just just just - hey, Jack Nicklaus is the greatest, the - hey Jack Nicklaus is the greatest, the hey, Jack Nicklaus is the greatest, the greatest, he is Tiger Woods, Tiger coming greatest, he is Tiger Woods, Tiger coming greatest. He is Tiger Woods, Tiger coming back.
Adam, Scott's wonderful he wanted to back. Adam. Scott's wonderful he wanted to back. Adam. Scott's wonderful he wanted to round. We love Adam Scott round. We love Adam Scott round. We love Adam, Scott, Phil Mickelson. We love what are you? Phil Mickelson. We love what are you, Phil Mickelson. We love what are you getting told, you can't talk much longer getting told, you can't talk much longer getting told you can't talk much longer a couple of minutes.
Okay, I don't think a couple of minutes, okay. I don't think a couple of minutes, okay, I don't think they went over the swing and the - they went over the swing and the - they went over the swing and the technique or anything. So, so give the grandchildren two minutes. So, so give the grandchildren two minutes.
So, so give the grandchildren two minutes give the golf three-and-a-half minutes. I give the golf three-and-a-half minutes. I give the golf three-and-a-half minutes. I saw a long time to be sitting there, saw a long time to be sitting there, saw a long time to be sitting there twiddling your thumbs. What else are we twiddling your thumbs?
What else are we twiddling your thumbs? What else are we to talk about? Let's talk about Hillary to talk about - let's talk about Hillary to talk about. Let's talk about Hillary. Let's talk about Hillary. Did you see - let's talk about Hillary. Did you see - let's talk about Hillary, did you see today?
Hillary announced that she may today, Hillary announced that she may today, Hillary announced that she may consider the Attorney General. I'm the consider the Attorney General. I'm the consider the Attorney General. I'm the casting aspersions on anybody other than casting aspersions on anybody other than casting aspersions.
On anybody other than Hillary in it, but she may consider the Hillary in it, but she may consider the Hillary in it. But she may consider the attorney general whose ruling under attorney general, whose ruling under attorney general, whose ruling under Kistner. Now they're ruling on the case Kistner, now they're ruling on the case Kistner.
Now they're ruling on the case to continue forward as attorney general to continue forward as attorney general to continue forward as attorney general. Now how do you make that statement when now? How do you make that statement when now how do you make that statement when they are gonna rule? Because remember, they are gonna rule because remember they are gonna rule because remember what happened the FBI makes their - what happened the FBI makes their - what happened, the FBI makes their recommendation and then still it's up to recommendation and then still it's up to recommendation.
And then still it's up to the attorney general's office, so Hillary, the attorney general's office. So Hillary, the attorney general's office. So Hillary said today at least according to what I said today, at least according to what I said today, at least according to what I saw on television, which you can't always saw on television, which you can't always saw on television, which you can't always believe.
I actually found it hard to believe. I actually found it hard to believe. I actually found it hard to believe she'd say this, but she said, believe she'd say this, but she said, believe she'd say this. But she said today that we may consider the Attorney today that we may consider the Attorney today that we may consider the Attorney General to go forward.
That's like a General to go forward. That's like a General to go forward. That's like a bribe, bribe bribe. I mean that if she wins, she's going to - I mean that if she wins, she's going to - I mean that if she wins, she's going to consider extending the Attorney General, consider extending the Attorney General, consider extending the Attorney General.
And you know, I'm not saying I'm gonna and you know, I'm not saying I'm gonna and you know, I'm not saying I'm gonna knock in the Attorney General, what I'm knock in the Attorney General, what I'm knock in the Attorney General. What I'm saying is how can you say that it's a saying is how can you say that it's a saying is how can you say that it's a bribe, bribe bribe?
I mean, the Attorney General sitting, I mean, the Attorney General sitting. I mean, the Attorney General sitting dancing, you know, I ain't get Hillary off dancing. You know, I ain't get Hillary off dancing. You know, I ain't get Hillary off the hook. I'm gonna have four more years the hook. I'm gonna have four more years.
The hook, I'm gonna have four more years or eight, four years, but she loses them or eight, four years, but she loses them or eight, four years, but she loses them out of a job. It's a bride said this out of a job. It's a bride said this out of a job, it's a bride said this grace, it's a disgrace. She is laughing at grace.
It's a disgrace. She is laughing at grace. It's a disgrace. She is laughing at the stupidity of our system. She is the stupidity of our system, she is the stupidity of our system, she is laughing and so does her husband bill laughing and so does her husband bill laughing and so does her husband bill laughing and what's going on because laughing and what's going on because Laughing and what's going on because them - and they've been there before you them and they've been there before you them and they've been there before.
You know, they've been there between know, they've been there between know, they've been there between whitewater and all of the others. They've - whitewater and all of the others, they've, whitewater and all of the others. They've been there. Look at her cattle futures. I been there. Look at her cattle futures.
I been there. Look at her cattle futures. I mean, she did better with cattle mean she did better with cattle mean she did better with cattle proportionately than people that have proportionately than people that have proportionately than people that have been in the cattle business, all their been in the cattle business, all their been In the cattle business, all their lives that have made millions of the lives that have made millions of the lives that have made millions of the cattle, she did better than they did.
And cattle, she did better than they did. And cattle, she did better than they did, and she never did it before. I wonder how she never did it before. I wonder how she never did it before. I wonder how that she's crooked Hillary bugs that she's crooked Hillary bugs, that she's crooked Hillary bugs. And now with all that going on, you have - and now with all that going on you have - and now with all that going on, you have Obama campaign and he's campaigning and Obama campaign and he's campaigning and Obama campaign and he's campaigning.
And this was set up a long time ago and he - this was set up a long time ago and he - this was set up a long time ago and he knew that the FBI was going to do this, knew that the FBI was going to do. This knew that the FBI was going to do this because it would have been very because it would have been very because it would have been very uncomfortable for him to campaign with uncomfortable for him to campaign with uncomfortable for him to campaign with her.
Actually, if they didn't take a pass her, actually if they didn't take a pass her, actually if they didn't take a pass on crooked, Hillary, so they take a pass on crooked, Hillary. So they take a pass on crooked, Hillary. So they take a pass, they announce they're not gonna press, they announce they're not gonna press, they announce they're not gonna press charges, lord behold a few hours later charges lord behold a few hours later charges lord behold a few hours later.
Let's have a press conference. Let's do a - let's have a press conference. Let's do a - let's have a press conference. Let's do a speech together, by the way, her speech speech together, by the way, her speech speech together, by the way, her speech, her speech, her speech was terrible. I - her speech, her speech was terrible.
I, her speech, her speech was terrible. I watched him watched him watched him. How boring was that the speech do we? How boring was that the speech do we? How boring was that the speech do we like Trump better? Do we like like Trump better? Do we like like Trump better? Do we like? Let me just tell you, let me just on - let me just tell you, let me just on - let me just tell you, let me just on because the word temperament comes in because the word temperament comes in because the word temperament comes in Houston system.
She's got a very strong Houston system, she's got a very strong Houston system. She's got a very strong temperament. I get the truth chopping off temperament. I get the truth chopping off temperament. I get the truth, chopping off heads, losing thousands and thousands and heads losing thousands. And thousands and heads losing thousands and thousands and thousands of people to these savage thousands of people to these savage thousands of people to these savage animals, right?
We need somebody with a animals, right? We need somebody with a animals, right? We need somebody with a tough temperament. It's - and I'll tell you whether its own trade and I'll tell you whether its own trade and I'll tell you whether its own trade, whether it's on military, whether it's at, whether it's on military, whether it's at, whether it's on military, whether it's at the border.
The last person, these other - the border, the last person, these other, the border, the last person, these other countries want to see as president of countries want to see as president of countries want to see as president of the United States because I'm going to the United States, because I'm going to the United States because I'm going to be fighting for you, not fighting for be fighting for you, not fighting for be fighting for you, not fighting for them.
I'm going to be fighting for you is them. I'm going to be fighting for you, is them, I'm going to be fighting for you is Donald J, Tom, Donald, J. Tom, Donald, J. Tom. So no answer, no answer, no answer. So a very amazing and prestigious man I - so a very amazing and prestigious man I. So a very amazing and prestigious man, I won't use his name, but some people would - won't use his name, but some people would - won't use his name.
But some people would know. I'm talking about - I was in his know I'm talking about - I was in his know. I'm talking about - I was in his house and he said Donald, I thought you house and he said Donald, I thought you house and he said Donald, I thought you were totally wrong. I thought you were were totally wrong.
I thought you were were totally wrong. I thought you were much too tough on China. I thought you much too tough on China. I thought you much too tough on China. I thought you were much too tough on Japan. I thought were much too tough on Japan, I thought were much too tough on Japan. I thought you were much too tough on Mexico and you were much too tough on Mexico and you were much too tough on Mexico and all of these other countries that you're - all of these other countries that you're - all of these other countries that you're talking to With respect - but I thought talking to with respect, but I thought talking to with respect, but I thought you were much too tough and for a year you were much too tough and for a year you were much too tough.
And for a year, I've been telling people he's being too - I've been telling people he's being too - I've been telling people he's being too tough. I thought you a much too tough, tough. I thought you a much too tough, tough. I thought you a much too tough Donald on Saudi Arabia, much too tough. I Donald on Saudi Arabia much too tough.
I Donald on Saudi Arabia much too tough. I thought you were much too tough on Japan thought you were much too tough on Japan thought you were much too tough on Japan because as you know and as you never - because as you know and as you never - because as you know and as you never Knew before I got involved, we pay for a knew before I got involved.
We pay for a knew before I got involved. We pay for a big portion of Japan's military and I big portion of Japan's military and I big portion of Japan's military. And I want them to help us out, want them to help us out - want them to help us out. This is in 40 years ago. This is in 30. This is in 40 years ago.
This is in 30. This is in 40 years ago. This is in 30 years ago, years ago, years ago, they're sending cars to us by the - they're sending cars to us by the - they're sending cars to us by the millions. And believe me, we don't need millions and believe me, we don't need millions. And believe me, we don't need more Iran nails done by incompetent more Iran nails done by incompetent more Iran nails done by incompetent people.
We need smart people, we need people, we need smart people, we need people, we need smart people, we need great negotiators and believe me, I'll great negotiators and believe me, I'll great negotiators and believe me, I'll head it up and I know what I'm doing head it Up and I know what I'm doing head it up and I know what I'm doing.
We have the greatest negotiators in the - we have the greatest negotiators in the - we have the greatest negotiators in the world and we don't use them. We use world and we don't use them, we use world and we don't use them. We use political hacks. So we take care of Japan political hacks. So we take care of Japan political hacks.
So we take care of Japan and we take care of Germany and we take and we take care of Germany and we take and we take care of Germany and we take care of lots of places. South Korea, we care of lots of places. South Korea, we care of lots of places. South Korea, we have 28,000 soldiers on the line between have 28,000 soldiers on the line between have 28,000 soldiers on the line between North and South Korea, South Korea or a North and South Korea, South Korea or a North.
And South Korea, South Korea or a television, see if you can buy one of the television, see if you can buy one of the television, see if you can buy one of the United States, you know the answer is you United States, you know the answer is You United States, you know the answer is you can't order other things, many other can't order other things, many other can't order other things.
Many other things, see if you can buy them, Hey, things see if you can buy them, Hey, things see if you can buy them, Hey, who just moved to Mexico, right, who just who just moved to Mexico, right, who just who just moved to Mexico, right? Who just moved to Mexico from Indiana, the great moved to Mexico from Indiana, the great moved to Mexico from Indiana, the great state of Indiana that gave me another state of Indiana that gave me another state of Indiana that gave me another great victory right carrier.
So we don't great victory right carrier, so we don't great victory right carrier. So we don't make that anymore. So carriers moving by make that anymore. So carriers moving by make that anymore. So carriers moving by the way, I would tell the people to carry the way I would tell the people to carry the way I would tell the people to carry love you people every time you make an love you people, every time you make an love, you People, every time you make an air-conditioning unit and enjoy your air-conditioning unit and enjoy your air-conditioning unit and enjoy your beautiful factory, you're gonna send it beautiful factory, you're gonna send it beautiful factory, you're gonna send it through that border, which is now a Very through that border which is now a very - through that border which is now a very strong, you moved to Mexico from Indiana, the great moved to Mexico from Indiana, the great moved to Mexico from Indiana, the great state of - in the state of - in the state Of in the - they gave me another great victory, right?
They gave me another great victory, right? They gave me another great victory right carrier. So we don't make that anymore. So carrier, so we don't make that anymore. So carrier, so we don't make that anymore. So Kari is moving by the way I would tell Kari is moving by the way I would tell Kari is moving by the way.
I would tell the people at carrier love you people, the people at carrier love you people. The people at carrier love you people. Every time you make an air-conditioning, every time you make an air-conditioning, every time you make an air-conditioning unit and enjoy your beautiful factory unit and enjoy your beautiful factory unit and enjoy your beautiful factory, you're going to send it through that.
You're going to send it through that. You're going to send it through that border which is now a very strong and border which is now a very strong and border which is now a very strong and secure border. And you're gonna pay 35 % secure border. And you're gonna pay 35 % secure border and you're gonna pay 35 % tax.
And you know what, they're not tax and you know what, they're not tax and you know what, they're not leaving, they're not leaving from then I leaving, they're not leaving from then I leaving, they're not leaving from. Then I can leave now. Hillary Clinton won't say and I'll now Hillary Clinton won't say and I'll now Hillary Clinton won't say and I'll tell you, the press hasn't treated right, tell you the press hasn't treated right, tell you the press hasn't treated right?
One person actually at the New York, one person actually at the New York one person actually at the New York Times, David Sanger, treated it right Times, David Sanger, treated it right Times. David Sanger treated it right along with Maggie along with Maggie along with Maggie. They wrote a story that was pretty - they wrote a story that was pretty - they wrote a story that was pretty accurate, about 82 percent, but I accurate about 82 percent, but I accurate about 82 percent.
But I mentioned this all the time and the mentioned this all the time and the mentioned this all the time and the press will go. Donald Trump wants Japan, press will go. Donald Trump wants Japan, press will go. Donald Trump wants Japan clear. They said you have to be prepared clear, they said you have to be prepared clear.
They said you have to be prepared always in a deal to walk for instance, always in a deal to walk for instance, always in a deal to walk for instance with the horrible deal we made with Iran with the horrible deal we made with Iran. With the horrible deal we made with Iran to horrible do then competetive Kerry to horrible do then competetive Kerry to horrible do then competetive.
Kerry should have picked up and walked a should have picked up and walked a should have picked up and walked a couple of times, he should have walked couple of times, he should have walked couple of times, he should have walked when they said they won't give Back our - when they said they won't give back our - when they said they won't give back our hostages until the deal is over, should hostages until the deal is over, should hostages until the deal is over, should have walked and then he should have have walked.
And then he should have - have walked and then he should have walked doubled up, the sanctions and by walked doubled up. The sanctions and by walked doubled up the sanctions and by the time they landed back in the United the time they landed back in the United. The time they landed back in the United States that could have turned the plane States that could have turned the plane States that could have turned the plane around.
You would have had those hostages around. You would have had those hostages around. You would have had those hostages back instead of waiting for years and he should have said what other thing and he should have said what other thing and he should have said what other thing folks, we gave them back 150 billion folks.
We gave them back 150 billion folks. We gave them back 150 billion dollars. I would have said it differently. Dollars, I would have said it differently dollars. I would have said it differently. I would have said, you know my father, I would have said, you know my father, I would have said, you know, my father used to say, son, you're too tough used to say, son.
You're too tough used to say, son. You're too tough take the lumps out soft, nice and easy. My take the lumps out soft, nice and easy. My take the lumps out soft, nice and easy. My father was great, good salesman, good father was great, good salesman, good father was great, good salesman, good builder.
He left to build houses was good builder, he left to build houses was good builder, he left to build houses, was good builder. I learned so much from - and he builder, I learned so much from - and he builder, I learned so much from and he was a great guy. Good lovely guy, loved my was a great guy, good lovely guy, loved my was a great guy, good lovely guy.
Loved my father, but he used to say son, son, you're father, but he used to say son, son, you're father, but he used to say son, son, you're too tough take the lump sum. So in the too tough take the lump sum. So in the too tough take the lump sum. So in the old days I would have said we're not old days, I would have said we're not old days.
I would have said we're not giving you the hundred and fifty billion giving you the hundred and fifty billion giving you the hundred and fifty billion dollars and they would have been angry dollars and they would have been angry dollars and they would have been angry. And we would have had lots of problems and we would have had lots of problems and we would have had lots of problems, right?
I wouldn't say it that way anymore, right? I wouldn't say it that way anymore, right? I wouldn't say it that way anymore. My father taught me to - well, I would have my father taught me to well, I would have my father taught me to well, I would have said fellas, and it is all fellas. I hate said fellas and it is all fellas.
I hate said fellas and it is all fellas. I hate to say they haven't figured out that the - to say they haven't figured out that the - to say they haven't figured out that the women are smarter than the men yet, okay? Women are smarter than the men. Yet, okay, women are smarter than the men yet. Okay, farewell.
Hey, whoa, farewell. Hey, whoa, farewell. Hey, whoa, it'll take about 150 to 200 more years. It'll take about 150 to 200 more years. It'll take about 150 to 200 more years, but they got ta figure it out, okay, then, but they got ta figure it out, okay, then, but they got ta figure it out, okay? Then we're really in trouble.
We're really in trouble. We're really in trouble. Can you imagine because the Persians are - can you imagine because the Persians are - can you imagine because the Persians are great negotiators and they totally out great negotiators and they totally out great negotiators and they totally out negotiate.
So I would assert, fellas, do me negotiate. So I would assert, fellas, do me negotiate so I would assert, fellas do me a favor. We have a problem. We have a bad a favor. We have a problem. We have a bad a favor. We have a problem. We have a bad budget that was just past the Omnibus budget that was just past the Omnibus budget that was just past the Omnibus Budget disaster or singly.
We're gonna bring so much back or singly. We're gonna bring so much back or singly. We're gonna bring so much back. We have - right now, I'd say it's five we have right now, I'd say it's five we have right now, I'd say it's five trillion dollars. The government says two. Trillion dollars, the government says two trillion dollars, the government says two and a half trillion, but it's a lot in and a half trillion, but it's a lot in and a half trillion.
But it's a lot in other places in other areas across the other places. In other areas across the other places, in other areas across the seas that we want to bring back my tax seas that we want to bring back my tax seas that we want to bring back my tax plan, which cuts taxes for everybody by plan, which cuts Taxes for everybody by plan which cuts taxes for everybody by the way including business and middle the way including business and middle the way including business and middle class and cut expenses.
We're gonna bring all and cut expenses. We're gonna bring all and cut expenses. We're gonna bring all that money back in that money's gonna be that money back in that money's gonna be that money back in that money's gonna be spent in the United States right now spent in the United States right now spent in the United States right now, they can't get the money back so you they can't get the money back so you they can't get the money back.
So you have corporate inversions, you have have corporate inversions, you have have corporate inversions, you have companies leaving the United States to companies leaving the United States to companies leaving the United States to get their money. They can't get the money, get their money, they can't get the money, get their money, they can't get the money back back back.
It's impossible bureaucratically and the - it's impossible bureaucratically and the - it's impossible bureaucratically and the taxes are so ridiculous that only a taxes are so ridiculous that only a taxes are so ridiculous that only a person that's really, really, really dumb person. That's really, really, really dumb person.
That's really, really, really dumb, would say send it so they leave the would say send it. So they leave the would say send it. So they leave the money over there and they take the money over there and they take the money over there and they take the company that moves the company to the company that moves the company to the company that moves the company to the money ever hear That one before and it's money ever hear that one before and it's money ever hear that one before and it's happening all over the place, take a look happening all over the place, take a look happening all over the place, take a look at what's going on And it's gonna eat at what's going on and it's gonna eat at what's going on and it's gonna eat.
It's going to end. We're one of the - it's going to end - we're one of the - it's going to end - we're one of the highest tax nations in the world. We're highest tax nations in the world. We're highest tax nations in the world. We're cutting the hell out of taxes. We're cutting the hell out of taxes. We're cutting the hell out of taxes.
We're cutting the hell out of these ridiculous, cutting the hell out of these ridiculous, cutting the hell out of these ridiculous regulations which are destroying our regulations, which are destroying our regulations which are destroying our businesses destroyed and we're gonna do. So just to finish cuz and we're gonna do so just to finish cuz and we're gonna do so just to finish cuz, I'm so proud of what I wrote.
I love it I - I'm so proud of what I wrote. I love it, I - I'm so proud of what I wrote. I love it. I actually love writing people don't actually love writing. People don't actually love writing people, don't realize you're nobody. Number one, realize you're nobody, number one, realize you're nobody, number one bestsellers like that.
And the art of the bestsellers like that and the art of the bestsellers like that and the art of the deal, I actually know how to write. I love deal. I actually know how to write. I love deal. I actually know how to write. I love reading this stuff, I love it reading this stuff, I love it reading this stuff, I love it.
The question really has to be asked is the question really has to be asked is the question really has to be asked is this, what is Hillary Clinton's photo and this - what is Hillary Clinton's photo and this - what is Hillary Clinton's photo? And to that, I'm even gonna say who keeps to that. I'm even gonna say who keeps to that.
I'm even gonna say who keeps - she's put as a danger and some people she's put as a danger and some people she's put as a danger. And some people say that it's corrupt financially. I say that it's corrupt financially. I say that it's corrupt financially. I don't care what her motive is. All I know don't care what her motive is.
All I know don't care what her motive is. All I know is she had a motive, but she's erased. So is she had a motive, but she's erased. So is she had a motive, but she's erased. So my emails will never find out, okay, Bill, my emails will never find out, okay, Bill, my emails will never find out, okay, Bill and Hillary Clinton, raked in millions of - and Hillary Clinton raked in millions of and Hillary Clinton raked in millions of dollars from foreign Government special dollars from foreign government, special dollars from foreign government, special interests and international corporations interests and international corporations interests and international corporations in exchange for favors folks for favors in exchange for favors folks for favors in exchange for favors folks for favors.
She's crooked. Hillary, don't you? She's crooked. Hillary, don't you? She's crooked, Hillary, don't you understand that? This is one of the most understand that this is one of the most understand that this is one of the most crooked politicians in history. These crooked politicians in history. These crooked politicians in history, these entities either funneled money into the entities, either funneled money into the entities, either funneled money into the Clinton Foundation for paid Bill Clinton, Clinton Foundation for paid Bill Clinton Clinton Foundation for paid Bill Clinton lavishly for speeches, lavishly for speeches, lavishly For speeches, competi fortune, at least 60 companies, competi fortune, at least 60 companies, competi fortune, at least 60 companies that lobbied the State Department during that lobbied the State Department during that lobbied the State Department.
During Clinton's tenure. As Secretary of State Clinton's tenure as Secretary of State Clinton's tenure as Secretary of State donated a total of 26 billion dollars to donated a total of 26 billion dollars to donated a total of 26 billion dollars to the Clinton Foundation. Okay? 26 million. The Clinton Foundation.
Okay, 26 million, the Clinton Foundation, okay, 26 million and she's dealing with his country's and she's dealing with his country's and she's dealing with his country's Bill Clinton. And by the way, many of Bill Clinton and by the way, many of Bill Clinton. And by the way, many of these countries treat women and want to these countries treat women and want to these countries treat women and want to enslave women and they treat women enslave women and they treat women enslave women and they treat women horribly.
And as far as the gay community horribly and as far as the gay community horribly and as far as the gay community, they push him off buildings and they - they push him off buildings and they - they push him off buildings and they kill him and they executed. And she has kill him and they executed and she has kill him and they executed and she has tens of millions of dollars from these tens of millions of dollars from these tens of millions of dollars from these countries.
Believe me, I am better for the countries, believe me, I am better for the countries, believe me, I am better for the gay community. I am better for women than gay community. I am better for women than gay community. I am better for women than she will ever be. She will ever be. She will ever be with her best game on her best day with her best game on her best day with her best game on her best day, Bill Clinton was paid a fortune to Bill Clinton was paid a fortune to Bill Clinton was paid a fortune to Deliver a speech in Moscow, Russia while deliver a speech in Moscow, Russia while deliver a speech in Moscow, Russia, while Hillary Clinton was in charge of the Hillary Clinton was in charge of the Hillary Clinton was in charge of the Russian recent another disaster, Bill.
Russian. Recent. Another disaster Bill Russian, recent another disaster Bill Clinton, was paid money by the Chinese Clinton was paid money by the Chinese. Clinton was paid money by the Chinese government, a lot and its supporters government a lot and its supporters, government a lot and its supporters while Hillary handled while Hillary handled, while Hillary handled China policy.
And during this time, China, China policy and during this time China, China policy and during this time China was stealing hundreds of billions of - was stealing hundreds of billions of was stealing hundreds of billions of dollars in United States intellectual dollars in United States intellectual dollars.
In United States intellectual property, okay folks we can go forever property, okay folks we can go forever property, okay folks we can go forever. ABC News said President Lee accepted, ABC News, said President, Lee accepted ABC News, said President Lee accepted speaking freeze from numerous companies.
Speaking freeze from numerous companies. Speaking freeze from numerous companies and individuals with interests pending and individuals with interests pending and individuals with interests pending before Hillary Clinton's State before Hillary Clinton's State before Hillary Clinton's State Department. Oh, that's nice.
That's nice Department. Oh, that's nice. That's nice Department. Oh, that's nice. That's nice International Business. Times said International Business Times said International Business Times said governments and corporations involved in governments and corporations involved in governments and corporations involved in the arms, fields approved by Clinton.
The arms fields approved by Clinton. The arms fields approved by Clinton State Department's have delivered. Listen, State Department's have delivered. Listen, State Department's have delivered. Listen to this, I've delivered her State to this. I've delivered her State to this. I've delivered her State Department Department Department.
She's the proving deal have delivered. She's the proving deal have delivered. She's the proving deal have delivered between 54 and 141 million dollars to between 54 and 141 million dollars to between 54 and 141 million dollars to the Clinton found a hundred and the Clinton found a hundred and the Clinton found a hundred and forty-one million dollars a Week poet forty-one million dollars a week, poet forty-one million dollars a week poet the - what's going on you to the Clinton, the - what's going on you to the Clinton, the - what's going on you to the Clinton Foundation as well as hundreds of Foundation as well as hundreds Of Foundation as well as hundreds of thousands of dollars in payments to the thousands of dollars in payments to the thousands of dollars in payments to the Clinton family.
Then when Hillary left Clinton family, then when Hillary left Clinton family, then when Hillary left the State Department, she was paying the State Department. She was paying the State Department. She was paying twenty one point six million dollars for twenty one point, six million dollars for twenty one point.
Six million dollars for speeches delivered in less than two speeches delivered in less than two speeches delivered in less than two years. That's not bad, 21 million dollars years, that's not bad, 21 million dollars years. That's not bad, 21 million dollars for making speeches. And she's a boring for making speeches and she's a boring for making speeches and she's a boring sneaker, she's terrible sneaker, she's terrible sneaker.
She's terrible, think what I could name, oh man without think what I could name, oh man without think what I could name, oh man without she's a terrible speaker, she's a terrible speaker, she's a terrible speaker, she got twenty one point, six million, she got twenty. One point six million, she got twenty one point, six million dollars for speeches and she refused us dollars for speeches and she refused us dollars for speeches and she refused us because Bernie Sanders knows this better because Bernie Sanders knows this better because Bernie Sanders knows this Better than any book she refuses to give up the than any book she refuses to give up the than any book she refuses.
To give up the text of the speeches, our own send, hey, I text of the speeches, our own send, hey, I text of the speeches, our own send, hey, I don't care, she gives it up because I don't care. She gives it up because I don't care. She gives it up because I understand her and I understand many of understand her and I understand many of understand her.
And I understand many of the people that are her supporters and the people that are her supporters and the people that are her supporters. And by the way, many of the friends of mine, by the way, many of the friends of mine, by the way, many of the friends of mine and they got ta phone her folks, they got and they got ta phone her folks.
They got and they got ta phone her folks, they got an owner. Don't forget I used to be on an owner, don't forget I used to be on an owner, don't forget I used to be on the other side of the equation. I used to the other side of the equation, I used to the other side of the equation. I used to be establishing that on June 16th, I ran - be establishing that on June 16th.
I ran - be establishing that on June 16th. I ran and everyone said, oh, he's no longer and everyone said, oh, he's no longer. And everyone said, oh, he's no longer establishment. He's not supposed to be establishment. He's not supposed to be establishment. He's not supposed to be running. He doesn't need our money.
That's running. He doesn't need our money that's running, he doesn't need our money, that's terrible. And I put up fifty five million terrible and I put up fifty five million terrible and I put up fifty five million dollars approximately in the primers and dollars approximately in the primers and dollars approximately in the primers and one big league.
And then - and I'm putting one big league and then - and I'm putting one big league and then - and I'm putting up money now, but I'm raising a lot of up money now. But I'm raising a lot of up money now, but I'm raising a lot of money for the party and it's good, it's money for the party and it's good, it's money for the party and it's good, it's good, it's really good.
We're gonna win good. It's really good. We're gonna win good. It's really good. We're gonna win this thing. We're gonna take this country, this thing we're gonna take this country, this thing we're gonna take this country back from these thieves and these back from these thieves and these back from these thieves and these critics and these horrible presidents, critics and these horrible Presidents, critics and these horrible presidents, these phony presidents, and I mean it - these phony presidents, and I mean it - these phony presidents.
And I mean it - what I'd say when Obama can take all of what I'd say when Obama can take all of what I'd say when Obama can take all of this time off. When you have bombings all this time off. When you have bombings all this time off, when you have bombings all over the place that you have Isis as an over the place that you have Isis as an over the place that you have Isis as an example.
And all of the bad deals. When he example and all of the bad deals when he example and all of the bad deals when he can take that kind of time off to spend can take that kind of time off to spend, can take that kind of time off to spend it with Hillary Clinton with the seal of it with Hillary Clinton, with the seal of it with Hillary Clinton.
With the seal of the president in front as she stands, the president in front as she stands, the president in front as she stands there, she doesn't look presidential to there. She doesn't look presidential to there. She doesn't look presidential to me folks, I can tell you that he doesn't me folks. I can tell you that he doesn't me folks.
I can tell you that he doesn't present hillarie old sod reason to hide her hillarie old sod reason to hide her hillarie old sod reason to hide her foreign policy disasters and the foreign policy disasters and the foreign policy disasters and the decisions that went into them. Her push decisions that went into them, her push decisions that went into them, her push for regime change in Libya, Egypt and for regime change in Libya, Egypt and for regime change in Libya.
Egypt and Syria has been a total and complete. Syria has been a total and complete. Syria has been a total and complete disaster disaster disaster. Her Iraq policy has been catastrophic. Her Iraq policy has been catastrophic. Her Iraq policy has been catastrophic. She's unleashed Isis across the Middle.
She's unleashed Isis across the Middle. She's unleashed Isis across the Middle East with her bad decisions and her bed East with her bad decisions and her bed East with her bad decisions and her bed judgement and she's going to do nothing judgement and she's going to do nothing judgement and she's going to Do nothing about it because she's a weak weak about it because she's a weak weak about it because she's a weak weak person.
She doesn't have the strength and person. She doesn't have the strength and person. She doesn't have the strength and she doesn't have the temperament believe she doesn't have the temperament believe she doesn't have the temperament. Believe me, there's gonna be more of the same me. There's gonna be more of the same me.
There's gonna be more of the same thoughts, more of the same in 2009 before thoughts more of the same in 2009 before thoughts more of the same in 2009 before she took office. Libya was cooperated, she took office, Libya was cooperated, she took office, Libya was cooperated, Syria was under control, Syria was under control, Syria was under control.
Iraq was seeing a reduction in violence. Iraq was seeing a reduction in violence. Iraq was seeing a reduction in violence and Iran was being choked and Iran was being choked and Iran was being choked, absolutely choked financial. They would absolutely choked financial. They would absolutely choked financial.
They would die now after she left. Isis controls die now after she left Isis controls die now after she left, Isis controls huge portions of Iraq, Syria and Libya, huge portions of Iraq, Syria and Libya, huge portions of Iraq, Syria and Libya committing unspeakable, inhuman, committing unspeakable, inhuman, committing unspeakable, inhuman atrocities and trying To launch attacks atrocities and trying to launch attacks atrocities and trying to launch attacks against the West, Iran and meanwhile has against the West Iran and meanwhile has against the West.
Iran and meanwhile has been placed on the path to nuclear been placed on the path to nuclear been placed on the path to nuclear weapons has become a true power. They've weapons has become a true power, they've weapons has become a true power. They've become a true power in the Middle East, become a true power in the Middle East, become a true power in the Middle East and beyond what they weren't a power we and beyond what they weren't a power we and beyond what they weren't a power.
We gave them power with that. Horrible gave them power with that. Horrible gave them power with that horrible, horrible deal. So Hillary Clinton's horrible deal. So Hillary Clinton's horrible deal. So Hillary Clinton's policies have spread Isis and made a policies, have spread Isis and made a policies.
Have spread Isis and made a ring, the dominant Islamic power of the ring, the dominant Islamic power of the ring, the dominant Islamic power of the Middle East. Hillary Clinton can't keep Middle East. Hillary Clinton can't keep Middle East. Hillary Clinton can't keep her emails safe. And you know what folks, her emails safe and you know what folks, her emails safe and you know what folks she sure as hell can't keep our country, she sure as hell can't keep our country, she sure as hell can't keep our country safe.
So I want to thank the people of North, so I want to thank the people of North. So I want to thank the people of North Carolina. It's been such an amazing, it's Carolina, it's been such an amazing, it's Carolina. It's been such an amazing - it's been such an amazing ride. We've had a lot of good times.
We've had - we've had a lot of good times. We've had - we've had a lot of good times. We've had a lot of fun. We've had a lot of speeches, a lot of fun. We've had a lot of speeches, a lot of fun. We've had a lot of speeches. We've had a lot of good times together. We've had a lot of good times together.
We've had a lot of good times together though seriously and look we need change though seriously and look we need change though seriously and look we need change not Obama change, you remember Obama use not Obama change, you remember Obama use not Obama change, you remember Obama Use good, we need change, it sounded so good, good.
We need change. It sounded so good, good. We need change. It sounded so good, everybody thought and I actually thought everybody thought and I actually thought everybody thought and I actually thought he'd be a cheerleader for the country. I - he'd be a cheerleader for the country. I - he'd be a cheerleader for the country.
I thought he'd be a cheerleader and it's thought he'd be a cheerleader and it's thought he'd be a cheerleader and it's really turned out to be a very divisive, really turned out to be a very divisive, really turned out to be a very divisive person, okay? We need changed and I hate person, okay, we need changed and I hate person, okay, we need changed and I hate to use the term, but we really do need to use the term.
But we really do need to use the term. But we really do need change. We need fresh, tough, bold ideas. We change, we need fresh, tough, bold ideas. We change. We need fresh, tough, bold ideas. We need people that know what they're doing, need people that know what they're doing, need people that know what they're doing.
We need people that aren't worried about. We need people that aren't worried about. We need people that aren't worried about political correctness. We can't. When I watched Obama a week ago spend a - when I watched Obama a week ago spend a when I watched Obama a week ago spend a whole speech on talking about why he whole speech on talking about why he whole speech on talking about why he shouldn't Necessarily have to say shouldn't necessarily have to say shouldn't necessarily have to say radical Islam why he shouldn't do it radical Islam, why he shouldn't do it radical Islam, why he shouldn't do it.
That's what the problem is and he - that's what the problem is and he - that's what the problem is and he doesn't even know it. I don't even think doesn't even know it. I don't even think doesn't even know it. I don't even think he honestly folks, I don't think he has he honestly folks, I don't think he has he honestly folks, I don't think he has a clue.
I don't think he knows what the a clue. I don't think he knows what the a clue. I don't think he knows what the hell is going on, okay. I don't think he hell is going on, okay. I don't think he hell is going on, okay. I don't think he knows what's going and you know it's a knows what's going and you know it's a knows what's going and you know it's a very interesting thing, but I was very interesting thing, but I was very interesting thing, but I was watching yesterday and Everybody say watching yesterday and everybody say watching yesterday and everybody say Isis, Isis, Isis, Isis now, you know you can Isis, Isis, Isis, Isis now.
You know you can Isis, Isis, Isis, Isis now. You know you can have - your definition has to do with have your definition. Has to do with have your definition has to do with territory and it has to do with other territory and it has to do with other territory. And it has to do with other things that we can both give you things that we can both give you things that we can both give you definitions of Isis and ISIL. But you definitions of Isis and ISIL, but you definitions of Isis and ISIL. But you ever notice people say Isis, except in ever notice, people say Isis, except in ever notice, people say Isis, except in this is ISIL ISIL because - and I saw this, this is ISIL ISIL because - and I saw this, this is ISIL ISIL because - and I saw This big driven back and I saw is the JV big driven back and I saw is the JV big driven back and I saw is the JV, remember that the JV ban, if that's the - remember that the JV ban, if that's the - remember that the JV ban.
If that's the JV, I sure as hell don't want to see the JV, I sure as hell don't want to see the JV. I sure as hell don't want to see the varsity right, don't worry, don't worry varsity, right, don't worry, don't worry. Varsity, right, don't worry. Don't worry if I win, they'll be the JV. And then if I win, they'll be the JV. And then if I win, they'll be the JV and then they'll go down to first grade pretty - they'll go down to first grade pretty - they'll go down to first grade pretty soon folks.
But he says I saw and you soon folks, but he says I saw and you soon folks, but he says I saw and you know it's almost like he does it to make know. It's almost like he does it to make know. It's almost like he does it to make people upset. I've had so many people say people upset. I've had so many people say people upset.
I've had so many people say why does he just say Isis? Forgetting why does he just say Isis? Forgetting why does he just say Isis forgetting about definitions and actually some about definitions and actually some about definitions and actually some friends of mine that are very, very good friends of mine that are very, very good friends of mine that are very, very good.
On the subject, say, Isis is actually more on the subject, say, Isis is actually more on the subject, say Isis is actually more accurate, but who knows? But everybody accurate but who knows? But everybody accurate but who knows. But everybody says Isis say it, he'll be serviced right says Isis say it, he'll be serviced right says Isis say it, he'll be serviced right to sales.
The lifestyle will be driven to sales. The lifestyle will be driven to sales. The lifestyle will be driven back. You know, it's always ISIL will be back, you know, it's always ISIL will be back. You know, it's always ISIL will be driven back. In the meantime, that's a driven back. In the meantime, that's a driven back.
In the meantime, that's a disaster. It's totally a disaster disaster. It's totally a disaster disaster. It's totally a disaster. Remember this and I said it before, our - remember this and I said it before, our - remember this and I said it before, our military is depleted at a time when military is depleted.
At a time when military is depleted at a time when probably in the history of this country, probably in the history of this country, probably in the history of this country, we need strong military. We are going to - we need strong military, we are going to - we need strong military, we are going to win North Carolina.
We are going to get rid of these fools. We are going to get rid of these fools. We are going to get rid of these fools, these fools that are running our country, these fools that are running our country, these fools that are running our country, they're fools, we are not going to go. They're fools, we are not going to go.
They're fools. We are not going to go four more years that even the FBI today, four more years that even the FBI today, four more years that even the FBI today talked so horribly about this person to talked. So horribly about this person to talked so horribly about this person to a point where you said, how can you a point where you said, how can you a point where you said, how can you possibly say no charges, what they said possibly say no charges.
What they said possibly, say no charges, what they said and what he said today was so bad. So - and what he said today was so bad. So - and what he said today was so bad. So here's what we're going to do. We're - here's what we're going to do. We're - here's what we're going to do. We're going to start winning again.
We're gonna going to start winning again. We're gonna going to start winning again. We're gonna win so much, you're gonna be so sick of win so much, you're gonna be so sick of win so much, you're gonna be so sick of winning folks. Oh, you're gonna be so winning folks, oh, you're gonna be. So winning folks - oh, you're gonna be so angry at me, you're gonna be so angry, you're gonna have your lieutenant - you're gonna have your lieutenant - you're gonna have your lieutenant governor's here, you're gonna have your governor's here, you're gonna have Your governor's here, you're gonna have your head of the Supreme Court miss you these head of the Supreme Court, miss you these head of the Supreme Court, miss you.
These are great people with great, great, where are great people with great, great, where are great people with great, great, where are they? Are they around here? They're are they are they around here, they're are they are they around here, they're here. These are great, great people with great, these are great, great people with great, these are great, great people with great reputations.
I will tell you outside of reputations. I will tell you outside of reputations. I will tell you, outside of North Carolina, North Carolina, North Carolina, they have great reputations, okay? And they have great reputations, okay? And they have great reputations, okay? And you're lucky down, but here's more - we're - you're lucky down, but here's more - we're - you're lucky down.
But here's more - we're gonna start winning again. We're gonna gonna start winning again. We're gonna gonna start winning again. We're gonna win at every level. We're gonna win with win at every level. We're gonna win with win at every level. We're gonna win with our military, we're gonna take care of our military, we're gonna take care of our military, we're gonna take care of our vets and we're gonna really take our vets and we're gonna really take our vets and we're Gon na really take care of our vets and it's not even a care of our vets and it's not even a care of our vets and it's not even a question of money.
It's a question of question of money. It's a question of question of money. It's a question of confidence we're spending so much money, confidence we're spending so much money, confidence, we're spending so much money and it's corrupt. It's a corrupt and it's corrupt, it's a corrupt and it's corrupt. It's a corrupt Enterprise, the Veterans Administration Enterprise, the Veterans Administration Enterprise.
The Veterans Administration, you look at what's going on in Arizona, you look at what's going on in Arizona, you look at what's going on in Arizona with the VA, it's a corrupt Enterprise. So with the VA, it's a corrupt Enterprise. So with the VA, it's a corrupt Enterprise, so we're gonna start winning.
We're going to - we're gonna start winning, we're going to - we're gonna start winning. We're going to win on the second amendment. We're not win on the second amendment. We're not win on the second amendment. We're not going to let people take our country going to let people take our country, going to let people take our country.
We're going to terminate Common Core out. We're going to terminate Common Core out. We're going to terminate Common Core out of Washington. We're gonna bring our of Washington, we're gonna bring our of Washington, we're gonna bring our education local local. So we can have our education, local, local. So we can have our education local, local.
So we can have our local people who love our children and local people who love our children and local people who love our children and who really understand our children, give who really understand our children, give who really understand our children, give them the kind of education That we want - we're going to repeal and replace.
We're going to repeal and replace. We're going to repeal and replace Obamacare so quickly. We're going to Obamacare so quickly. We're going to Obamacare so quickly. We're going to create strong, strong borders. We're gonna create strong, strong borders, we're gonna create strong, strong borders, we're gonna build our wall, we're gonna stop drugs, build our wall, we're gonna stop drugs, build our wall.
We're gonna stop drugs from flowing into our country like water from flowing into our country like water from flowing into our country like water. It's flowing into our country like water. It's flowing into our country like water. It's flowing into our country like water. We're gonna protect our state's we're - we're gonna protect our state's we're - we're gonna protect our state's we're gonna protect our youth and others from gonna protect our youth and others from gonna protect our youth and others from the drugs that are Flowing through the - the drugs that are flowing through the - the drugs that are flowing through the shutter, we are going to make the greatest trade.
We are going to make the greatest trade. We are going to make the greatest trade deals anyone's ever made. We're going to deals anyone's ever made. We're going to deals anyone's ever made. We're going to bring our jobs back. We're going to bring - bring our jobs back, we're going to bring, bring our jobs back, we're going to bring manufacturing back, we're going to be manufacturing back.
We're going to be manufacturing back. We're going to be selling things to other countries. We're selling things to other countries. We're selling things to other countries. We're not going to let countries come in and not going to let countries come in and not going to let countries come in and take advantage of us.
Take our companies take advantage of us, take our companies, take advantage of us, take our companies out, sell their goods with no tax, with no out sell their goods with no tax, with no out sell their goods with no tax with no nothing. And then when our manufacturers nothing and then when our manufacturers nothing.
And then when our manufacturers want to go to China and other places to want to go to China and other places to want to go to China and other places to sell their goods, they can't get that sell their goods. They can't get that sell their goods. They can't get that goods into the country because the goods into the country because the goods into the country, because the Chinese say we don't want you goods.
So Chinese say we don't want you goods. So Chinese say we don't want you goods, so they dump onto our land and they dump they dump onto our land and they dump they dump onto our land and they dump their steel that they dump their - their steel that they dump their - their steel that they Dump their aluminum and they destroy our factories, aluminum and they destroy our factories, aluminum and they destroy our factories and they destroy so much.
And you know and they destroy so much and you know and they destroy so much and you know what folks we're gonna end up doing our, what folks we're gonna end up doing our, what folks we're gonna end up doing our own products largely. Again, and you know own products largely again and you know own products largely again and you know what, let me tell you our products and what - let me tell you our products and what - let me tell you our products and I'm not for isolation.
This is only if I'm not for isolation, this is only if I'm not for isolation. This is only if they don't behave, but they devalue their - they don't behave, but they devalue their - they don't behave, but they devalue their currency. They make it impossible for our currency. They make it impossible for our currency.
They make it impossible for our companies to compete. Every time we start companies to compete, every time we start companies to compete, every time we start to do well, various countries that are to do well, various countries that are to do well, various countries that are grandmasters, they start devaluing their grandmasters, they start devaluing their Grandmasters, they start devaluing their currencies and our countries go from boy.
Currencies and our countries go from boy, currencies and our countries go from - boy, I'm feeling good today to - oh, here we go. I'm feeling good today to - oh, here we go. I'm feeling good today to - oh, here we go again. You can't compete. It's cheating. Again, you can't compete, it's cheating again, you can't compete, it's cheating.
It's a big form of cheating. We are going - it's a big form of cheating. We are going - it's a big form of cheating. We are going to take care of our manufacturers and to take care of our manufacturers and to take care of our manufacturers and we're gonna start making product again, we're gonna start making product again, we're gonna start making product again.
And let me tell you something we may pay and let me tell you something we may pay and let me tell you something. We may pay a little more for the product, but we're a little more for the product, but we're a little more for the product. But we're gonna have all those jobs that make the gonna have all those jobs that make the gonna have all those jobs that make the product in the long run.
Whether and a lot of that will come back. And and a lot of that will come back and - and a lot of that will come back. And again, no isolation we're gonna have fair, again, no isolation we're gonna have fair. Again, no isolation. We're gonna have fair trade, we're gonna have free trade, one of trade, we're gonna have free trade, one of trade.
We're gonna have free trade one of these people sitting right up there or these people sitting right up there or these people sitting right up there or SP the other day. What do you do? Do you SP the other day? What do you do? Do you SP the other day, what do you do? Do you call it fair trade, do you call it free, call it fair trade, do you call it free, call it fair trade, do you call it free trade?
It's all good. I can give you ten trade. It's all good. I can give you ten trade, it's all good. I can give you ten different names for trade, different names for trade, different names for trade, here's what I call it. We're gonna make, here's what I call it. We're gonna make. Here's what I call it. We're gonna make great deals from our country.
I don't great deals from our country. I don't great deals from our country. I don't care if it's there. If it's three, I don't care if it's there. If it's three, I don't care. If it's there, if it's three, I don't think that they have one of this. We're think that they have one of this. We're think that they have one of this, we're gonna make great.
We're not gonna let gonna make great. We're not gonna let gonna make great, we're not gonna let happen what's been happening so close happen, what's been happening so close happen, what's been happening so close, we're gonna start winning again. We're gonna start winning again. We're gonna start winning again, we're gonna win so much, you're gonna be we're gonna win so much, you're gonna be we're gonna win so much, you're gonna be so sick of me, you're gonna have the so sick of me.
You're gonna have the so sick of me, you're gonna have the justice call me, you're gonna have the justice call me, you're gonna have the justice, call me, you're gonna have the lieutenant governor and the governor, lieutenant governor and the governor, lieutenant Governor and the governor call me and say mr.
president, the people call me and say mr. president, the people call me and say mr. president, the people of North Carolina are sick and tired of of North Carolina are sick and tired of of North Carolina are sick. And tired of winning, you're winning too much, they're winning, you're winning too much, they're winning, you're winning too much.
They're really starting to dislike you, mr. really starting to dislike you, mr. really starting to dislike you, mr. president. And I'm going to tell the president, and I'm going to tell the president, and I'm going to tell the justice, and I'm going to tell the justice, and I'm going to tell the justice, and I'm going to tell the governor and the lieutenant governor, I'm governor.
And the lieutenant governor, I'm governor and the lieutenant governor - I'm sorry, sorry, sorry, we got ta keep winning because we're - we got ta keep winning because we're - we got ta keep winning because we're gonna make America great again, doing exactly what I was asking him to Doing exactly what I was asking him to doing exactly what I was asking him to do and I and I know that he doesn't do and I and I know that he doesn't do and I - and I know that he doesn't follow me and I like you Know he has to follow me and I like you know he has to follow me and I like you know he has to watch everything that I ask him to do, watch everything that I ask him to do, watch everything that I ask him to do.
But when one of the main things that I - but when one of the main things that I - but when - one of the main things that I wanted Donald Trump to do in this speech wanted Donald Trump to do in this speech wanted Donald Trump to do in This speech tonight, tonight, tonight, I wanted him to come out, I wanted him to, I wanted him to come out.
I wanted him to, I wanted him to come out. I wanted him to come out firing, I wanted him to, to blow come out firing. I wanted him to to blow come out, firing, I wanted him to, to blow up the base. I wanted him to come out and up the base. I wanted him to come out and up the base. I wanted him to come out and go after Hillary Clinton and that's go after Hillary Clinton and that's go after Hillary Clinton and that's exactly what he did.
That's exactly what exactly what he did. That's exactly what exactly what he did. That's exactly what he did tonight. And we need to see more he did tonight and we need to see more he did tonight and we need to see more of it going forward. He can't hold back of it going forward. He can't hold back of it going forward.
He can't hold back. He can't - he can't by this tongue, this is - he can't, he can't by this tongue, this is - he can't, he can't by this tongue, this is it. This is for all the marbles and we it - this is for all the marbles and we it. This is for all the marbles and we need you. We need all of you to support need you.
We need all of you to support need you. We need all of you to support him at Donald, J, Trump, comm, we're gonna him at Donald, J, Trump, comm, we're gonna him at Donald, J. Trump, comm, we're gonna be on it, Don o'clock tonight. We're gonna be on it, Don o'clock tonight. We're gonna be on it, Don o'clock tonight.
We're gonna be - we're gonna be talking to Al about be we're gonna be talking to Al about be we're gonna be talking to Al about Asaro, who is the First Sergeant who has Asaro, who is the First Sergeant who has Asaro, who is The First Sergeant who has been going and traveling along with been going and traveling along with been going and traveling along with Donald Trump, we're gonna talk to him and Donald Trump, we're gonna talk to him and Donald Trump, we're gonna talk to him And we're also gonna talk to Bruce Laval, who we're also gonna talk to Bruce Laval, who we're also gonna talk to Bruce Laval, who is in charge of the national diversity is in charge of the national diversity is in charge of the national diversity.
For Trump coalition, you heard Donald for Trump coalition, you heard Donald for Trump coalition. You heard Donald Trump say that he is going to support Trump say that he is going to support Trump say that he is going to support and work for and help the black. And work for and help the black and work for and help the black community.
We're gonna talk to mr. Bruce community. We're gonna talk to mr. Bruce community. We're gonna talk to mr. Bruce LaBelle about that. And then we're going LaBelle about that. And then we're going LaBelle about that and then we're going to talk to Al at the bottom of a half an to talk to Al at the bottom of a half an to talk to Al at the bottom of a half an hour.
We're going to talk to him when hour. We're going to talk to him when hour we're going to talk to him when we're gonna get what he thinks about. We're gonna get what he thinks about. We're gonna get what he thinks about this Hillary Clinton situation because this Hillary Clinton situation because this Hillary Clinton situation, because you know that that woman needs to be in.
You know that that woman needs to be in. You know that that woman needs to be in jail. You know that woman got off because jail. You know that woman got off because jail. You know that woman got off because the FBI didn't have to go Nance it. The FBI didn't have to go Nance it. The FBI didn't have to go Nance it, didn't have the testicles, it has the - didn't have the testicles.
It has the - didn't have the testicles. It has the steak, testicular, fortitude to basically steak, testicular, fortitude to basically steak, testicular, fortitude to basically take down Hillary Clinton. And her take down, Hillary Clinton and her take down Hillary Clinton and her husband. So we're gonna be talking about husband.
So we're gonna be talking about husband. So we're gonna be talking about those things tonight here on the right those things tonight here on the right those things tonight here on the right side, broadcaster network, so and then side broadcaster network, so and then side broadcaster network. So - and then we're also gonna have cam Nelson, you, we're also gonna have cam Nelson, you.
We're also gonna have cam Nelson, you know our beautiful cannon Nelson and know our beautiful cannon Nelson and know our beautiful cannon Nelson and then we're gonna have mr. hutch Baylor, then we're gonna have mr. hutch Baylor, then we're gonna have mr. hutch Baylor jr., we're gonna have the hope we had a - jr., we're gonna have the hope we had a - jr., we're gonna have the hope.
We had a group, I'm gonna head to group. So we need group, I'm gonna head to group. So we need group, I'm gonna head to group, so we need to stick around here on the right side to stick around here on the right side to stick around here. On the right side Broadcasting Network, we want to explain Broadcasting Network.
We want to explain Broadcasting Network, we want to explain some things to you, even open up some, some things to you, even open up some, some things to you even open up some. We're gonna open up your eyes to a whole, we're gonna open up your eyes to a whole, we're gonna open up your eyes to a whole lot of things.
But remember remember lot of things. But remember remember lot of things. But remember, remember, whatever you do on social media, whatever, whatever you do on social media, whatever, whatever you do on social media, whatever you do for Twitter, whatever you do for you do for Twitter, whatever you do for you do for Twitter, whatever you do for Facebook, You got to share whatever Facebook you got to share whatever Facebook you got to share whatever Donald Trump is putting out, you got Donald Trump is putting out, you got Donald Trump is putting out, you got okay, not only do you have to share it, okay, not Only do you have to share it, okay, not only do you have to share it, you also have to go and talk to your - you also have to go and talk to your - you also have to go and talk to your neighbors and got to talk to People in neighbors and got to talk to people in neighbors and got to talk to people in your neighborhood, you got to talk to your neighborhood, you got to talk to your neighborhood.
You got to talk to people and talk to your friends, talk to people and talk to your friends, talk to people and talk to your friends, talk to your family. You got to let them know your family. You got to let them know your family. You got to let them know that we can't allow Hillary Clinton to that. We can't allow Hillary Clinton to that.
We can't allow Hillary Clinton to be elected because what you saw today be elected because what you saw today be elected because what you saw today with the FBI and comienzo, what she saw with the FBI and comienzo, what she saw with the FBI and comienzo. What she saw today, they're gonna keep doing it today.
They're gonna keep doing it today. They're gonna keep doing it. They're gonna keep doing it. You don't - they're gonna keep doing it. You don't - they're gonna keep doing it. You don't think that Hillary Clinton is gonna find - think that Hillary Clinton is gonna find, think that Hillary Clinton is gonna find the Holy Ghost.
And if she's elected you the Holy Ghost and if she's elected you the Holy Ghost and if she's elected, you know it's gonna be worse because now know it's gonna be worse because now know it's gonna be worse because now she's gonna have A power of the - she's gonna have a power of the - she's gonna have a power of the presidency behind her and we can't have presidency behind her and we can't have presidency behind her and we can't have that.
We can't have that. We need somebody that we can't have that we need somebody that we can't have that we need. Somebody who American II, who is a patriotic who - who - American II, who is a patriotic who - who - American II, who is a patriotic who loves this country, who's not bought by loves. This country who's not bought by loves.
This country who's not bought by the politicians, we need somebody who is the politicians, we need somebody who is the politicians, we need somebody who is gonna be a straight shooter. We need gonna be a straight shooter. We need gonna be a straight shooter. We need somebody who's gonna talk to us and somebody who's gonna talk to us and somebody who's gonna talk to us and Donald Trump talks to us, you saw that Donald Trump talks to us.
You saw that Donald Trump talks to us. You saw that tonight, you saw that tonight on the tonight, you saw that tonight on the tonight, you saw that tonight on the video, he talks to us. So at nine o'clock video, he talks to us. So at nine o'clock video, he talks to us. So at nine o'clock tonight you need to come back here on tonight.
You need to come back here on tonight. You need to come back here on the right side, broadcast network, you the right side, broadcast network, you the right side broadcast network. You need listen to the Wayne to pre-show and need listen to the Wayne to pre-show and need listen to the Wayne to pre-show and kam and hutch.
And again, we have two, kam and hutch. And again, we have two kam and hutch. And again, we have two great guests to call, and mr. Bruce great guests to call, and mr. Bruce great guests to call. And mr. Bruce LaBelle, who's going to talk about the LaBelle, who's going to talk about the LaBelle, who's going to talk about the national diversity Coalition for Trump, national diversity, Coalition for Trump, national diversity Coalition for Trump, okay?
The national diversity Coalition, okay. The national diversity Coalition, okay, the national diversity Coalition for Trump, the media is telling you that for Trump the media is telling you that for Trump the media is telling you that mr. Trump can't can't connect with mr. Trump, can't can't connect with mr.
Trump, can't can't Connect with blacks the media is telling you that mr. blacks the media is telling you that mr. blacks the media is telling you that mr. Trump can't connect with Latinos, but Trump can't connect with Latinos, but Trump can't connect with Latinos. But he's doing it anyway. You see it, I see it, he's doing it anyway.
You see it. I see it. He's doing it anyway. You see it. I see it. We see the Twitter, we see the Facebook, we see the Twitter, we see the Facebook, we see the Twitter, we see the Facebook, we see all of these groups that are - we see all of these groups that are - we see all of these groups that are supporting Donald Trump of color, we see supporting Donald Trump of color, we see supporting Donald Trump of color.
We see these things and that's what you need to these things and that's what you need to these things and that's what you need to push out there. So we got mr. Bruce push out there. So we got mr. Bruce push out there. So we got mr. Bruce LaBelle calling and then we got Allen LaBelle calling and then we got Allen LaBelle calling and then we got Allen and you know I can take it anywhere.
Yeah, and you know I can take it anywhere. Yeah, and you know I can take it anywhere, yeah, I mean al doesn't like to meet in the - I mean al doesn't like to meet in the - I mean al doesn't like to meet in the first place. So basically what we got first place. So basically, what we got first place, so basically what we got going on, we have the Wayne Dupree show going on.
We have the Wayne Dupree show going on. We have the Wayne Dupree show. It's all you. It's all you. Sometimes we - it's all you. It's all you. Sometimes we - it's all you, it's all you sometimes we take phone calls tonight, probably won't take phone calls tonight, probably won't take phone calls tonight, probably won't be taking as many phone calls, but we do be taking as many phone calls.
But we do be taking as many phone calls, but we do need to hear from you. We do need to hear, need to hear from you. We do need to hear, need to hear from you. We do need to hear from you tomorrow night. We have Scott from you tomorrow night. We have Scott from you tomorrow night. We have Scott Baio. As a matter of fact, we have Scott Baio as a matter of fact, we have Scott Baio as a matter of fact, we have Scott Baio calling in tomorrow night here on Baio calling in tomorrow night here on Baio calling in tomorrow night here on the way Into pre-show, and I know he's the way into pre-show and I know he's the way into pre-show and I know he's gonna have some things to say gonna have some things to say gonna have some things to say only that we're gonna take Some more only that we're gonna take some more only that we're gonna take some more.
We're gonna take some phone calls, we're gonna take some phone calls, we're gonna take some phone calls tomorrow, but I tell you what nine tomorrow. But I tell you what, nine tomorrow, but I tell you what, nine o'clock tomorrow ain't 9 o'clock tonight, o'clock tomorrow ain't 9 o'clock tonight, o'clock tomorrow ain't 9 o'clock tonight.
We're gonna be here right on the right. We're gonna be here right on the right. We're gonna be here right on the right side, Broadcasting Network, no holds side Broadcasting Network, no holds side Broadcasting Network, no holds barred, baby, no holds barred, we'll talk barred baby, no holds barred, we'll talk barred baby, no holds barred.